I have to stop into work tomorrow and talk to them about my return from maternity leave. Yep, my turn at the stay at home Mom thing is over and I have to go back reality now. Fun while it lasted.
6:15 a.m. to 7:00 a.m. -- Walk around the resort either alone or with my new friend, Margaret, from Chicago. I enjoyed the beautiful scenery!
No I cant be(frantically recounting),I definitely made 54....
Arab League Deputy Secretary-General Ahmed Ben Heli told reporters in Egypt that Elaraby will now visit Damascus on Saturday. He said the decision was made in a phone call between Elaraby and Syrian Foreign Minister Walid al-Moallem.
And lastly, I've been tagged again - this time by Amy of Harriet Homemaker Strikes Again. Since I did my fair share of tagging recently, I'll settle this time for answering Amy's questions . . .
This is followed by the Gospel Acclamation (Alleluia) which is usually sung. We stand during the Gospel Acclamation. During the Lenten season the Alleluia is not sung or said. As we stand and sing the priest carries the Book of the Gospels to the ambo. After the Alleluia we continue to stand for the Gospel.
Jesus uses this illustration because in that day and this one someone comes into our house and threaten our family or tries to rob us and we knew they were coming I would set up night watch and shoot them before they made it in the house. In that day also robbers where everywhere and it was a literal illustration we would stay up in shifts to make sure that it didn’t happen.
Can't wait!
I think I'll take my Mom a can of TAB next time I go to her house. I don't think she has a clue that TAB is available in stores these days, so I can't wait to see the look on her face when she see's it.
Icebound Frostbrood Vanquisher – Glory of the ICC Hero 25
For my friends who subscribe to Morsels of Mercy and automatically get a copy sent to your email, check out the blog on my website to see additional photos of my family http://morselsofmercy.wordpress.com
49. Loving me in spite of myself
Life is more that what we see.
Bottles again! I re-arranged the still-life from Saturday’s class. My demonstration/discussion covered most of the points made on Saturday but I added one new thought. A few of the bottles below were done with a ‘crisp edge’ approach. Each wash was allowed to dry before a darker one was applied.
Today, after hearing a radio snippet about the U.S. cutting aid to Egypt, Emma asked why we send money to other countries instead of spending it here. Why did she ask me that? Because she didn't understand. Because she was curious. Because it's relevant to her life, being related to current events that we've been discussing a bit here and to the financial situation of people she knows who are struggling in the recession.
Why I read it to the end: Short and simple. And it was about vampires.
Ingredients: (this is cut in half from the recipe)
Having read everything in the Sherlock Holmes cannon, there is a certain feeling of let-down when you reach the end of the last novel.
The winds that travel by?
A friend who is a runner and occasional cyclist recommended some soft chews and natural gels, which she says come the closest to feeling like eating normal food while keeping her energy levels stable. I bought a couple of samples, but haven't tried them yet.
Who I truly am is simple.
Me, "I felt undermined. I felt like you either didn't want the food I was going to make and never told me, or you thought I was ill prepared or neglected making it. It made me feel like you thought I was neglecting you and you had to fend for yourself."
So this morning I went into the bathroom, and attempting to do my squats silently, did a couple of reps, lost my balance, fell back, and clocked myself squarely on the back of the head with the lip of the sink. I then fell (loudly) onto the tile floor.
Some research has found that asking people to smile helps put them in a better mood, Boehm noted, although long-term effects aren’t clear.
Time Saving DLC
And our normal DT girls have also used a Sassy Studio Designs image to showcase their Steampunk creations: All the DT images are from Sassy Studio Designs NOV 11, 2011
2010.09.18 Afghanistan Baghlan 7 5 Seven locals are killed in an Islamist assault on a voting station.
Light — let’s call it love, because that’s what we’re really talking about here — passing from one person to another is no different in cause and effect, but you may want to initiate it by focusing on someone. When you do, instantaneously the vibrations in your thoughts and feelings reach that person. The energy flows from you along your thought form of intent and intensity, and the same measure of love that you sent goes directly to the “energy address” you want it to. There can be no “false addresses” because the intent and feelings are totally clear. The receiver won’t consciously know this, of course, but the receiver’s soul is aware of the “delivery.”
Molly was created by my sweet friend, and very talented artist, Barby Anderson, who's lovely blog is called Morning Glory Workshop.
Before I headed back into the Revision cave (did I mention I was back in The Cave? You should join me! Neverending supply of Nibs! Dress code: Sweats!), I had the chance to read this book:
“It’s a great opportunity for me to be here in Singapore personally to represent Indian cinema on such a global platform. I’m sure that this year’s IIFA will be a phenomenal success.”
Mom and Dad on their Wedding Day - 1944
I arise today
of defeat in our poems’ last line,
Burton was nominated seven times for an Acadamy Award, six for best actor. He never won. He will be remembered also for the very public romance and twice marriage to Elizabeth Taylor.
Linda Koco, MBA, is a contributing editor to InsuranceNewsNet, specializing in life insurance, annuities and income planning.
In the track "Iceland" Mark referred to singer Megas.
It’s Spring, my Love.
Me, I’m more of a electronic person. I don’t have a canvas bag, but I have a pile of thumb drives. Sometimes I pick them all up and play with them. They click together very nicely, kind of like dice. It’s a sensory thing.
#18 – Terminator 2: Judgment Day
3 sisters are separated:
Inevitably, despite telling my GP a couple of weeks ago that the pain in my foot had been going on for two months and the pain in my shoulder for a month, the guy (whom I had never met before – you get whoever is free at my GP practice) pooh-poohed and refused to get me an X-ray and gave me simple painkillers, saying the painkillers would clear up the problem in “a couple of days”.
What is really enchanting is to witness the arrogant move of the peacocks…moving freely around the park…so proud…roaming as if they were the king or queen of the park….their strident cries will echo the place…
An eighteen-year-old queen in love with the enemy as their countries pass the point of no return...
"Of all lies, art is the least untrue."
ISBN: 978-0-385-34197-4
CIRCUIT
This is the biggest piece I have made in a long time. For some reason my resin faces NEVER turn out how I imagine them in my head, so it is pretty much an 'I wonder what it will look like' session, when sculpting these. The face is entirely made by hand, like the rest of my creations.
Here's the recipe, it's definitely one for the chocolate lovers!
Forecasters had predicted lows of minus 11 degrees in northwest Arkansas and minus 10 degrees in parts of Oklahoma. But temperatures instead dipped to minus 18 in Fayetteville and to minus 28 in Bartlesville, Okla.
2) Use white board so that I can stand and think, than stare, type at my mac book air all the time. Invest in a better laptop ( it has increased my productivity, reduced strain)
Pakistan had questioned US act of entering their country without permission.But they could not explain how he was living in Abottabad, stone’s throw away from ISI Building.America also clearly stated that he cannot exist without support systems in Pakistan.
Holidays & Events
Morgen: They don’t but then top publishers are cutting down as well. I’ve only had one author so far say that they don’t do any of their marketing, that the publisher does it all, but she’s still active on Facebook and Twitter which I think are the main ways of capturing an audience. Do you write under a pseudonym? Do you think they make a difference to an author’s profile?
I've seen this word here and here often also. Coupled with my experiences in 2011, the word CULTIVATE just seemed to be jumping out at me. Becky Higgins often tweets about "cultivating the good life" in our daily life with a little something. I want to start collecting her quotes because each of them has rung so true for me so far.
c. That a correlation exists between degrees of value and degrees of reality (so that the supreme values also possess the supreme reality) is a metaphysical postulate proceeding from the presupposition that we know the order of rank of values; namely, that this order of rank is a moral order--Only with this presupposition is truth necessarily part of the definition of all the highest values.
We need to find a shipping company.
It's not, so just answer vaguely with something like the classic "jalan jalan," which means just wandering around.
i’ve got a healthy, beautiful baby girl
“When A/H1N1′s existence had been firmly established in the United States by May 10, 2009, Wisconsin and Illinois had nearly a third of the country’s cases. Since then Wisconsin has consistently led the nation despite its population of 5,627,967 based on July 2008 estimates versus the larger states – California, Texas, New York, Illinois and even Michigan with July 2008 populations of 36,755,666, 24,326,974, 19,490,297, 12,901,563 and 10,003,422, respectively. By June 12, 2009 when dispersion had set in, Wisconsin and Illinois still accounted for more than a quarter of U.S. cases. Demographically speaking this disproportionate caseload makes little sense. However, when Madison, WI is viewed as the point of origin, the two-State caseload provides incontrovertible evidence of the virus’ inception. …
St. Bernardus Christmas Ale
Ya know how we call our baby girl Lou Lou or lulu how ever you want to spell it?
I know plenty about writer's block, but this is different. Its more like "writer's drunk" in that my metaphorical speech is slurred and things are a wee bit blurry. Have you ever had writer's drunk? Did you pitch out the work and start fresh, or go back and sort it all out?
Two and a Half Men. OK, now I'm starting to miss Sheen. Kutcher's lonely hearts club band song is a bit of suspending disbelief. He's funny, but Alan and his dopey son seem like they belong to another sitcom. The three are not coming together in a convincing way. You can see the strain.
...here's wishing you out there a healthy Monday :)
Still, call me old-fashioned. I never send an editor a project without formally asking if it is okay to do so and I think it’s helpful to have a pitch that orients the editor as he or she begins the read.
"I'll do him and...*Laughs*... Backup." - Linze
Oh and if you didn't know, Marcia and Andy are opening a beautiful new bar which will be called Mr & Mrs G on the river in a new building in front of their restaurant in the next couple of months. I have been very lucky to work on the interior of the bar and let me tell you Brisbane you are in for a big treat. It will be something very special.
Okay, I have spent the last twenty minutes thinking on this one very carefully and it has come to my attention that there are exactly three (big) things that I still need to forgive myself for. Since I am not ready to share the first of these things in a public forum, and since the second is to do with my writing – and something I’ve touched on often in earlier posts – I will now discuss the third.
Starting off at the top-edge of the motherboard, we can clearly see a wide range of I/O Ports. No DVI and VGA Ports here though, since they’ve decided to put an mPCIe+mSATA combo expansion card in exchange of the said ports. There’s also a Clear CMOS button, and the super nice ROG Connect Button, that works wonders by enabling the user to monitor the system’s status, as well as enabling the user to overclock at hardware level using a notebook PC. You just have to download the software at the notebook, plug it at the White UBS Port, press the button, initialize the software, and you’re good to go. There’s also the Intel LAN Port, that is furthermore managed by ASUS’ GameFirst, to provide a better network throughput.
Or did they?
Here are some excerpts from the booklet that we used....
1 theory
The vogue for musical monsters began in 1841 when Chumworth Blighter, the progressive impresario, arranged the first season of afternoon concerts in which imaginary beings were the sole performers. Prior to this achievement, common wisdom had decreed that monsters "should be screamed but not heard". Rapidly growing in popularity, recitals by monsters of music composed by monsters soon became the dominant form of acoustical entertainment in concert halls, theatres and outdoor arenas. The fad crumpled just three years later when notes H to Z inclusive, the ones most favoured by monsters, were officially removed from the octave in compliance with wide-ranging austerity measures.
I Just don't get the mechanics of it. I worry about the questions it throws up, the myriad of grey areas and poor original specification of what is admissible on your list.
changed into a Japanese-style robe and was ready to start preparing my
The difficulty in making a black pale is trying to find harmony amid clashing elements--hops and black malts. Trickery can overcome the paradox--you can darken an IPA so that it looks visually black but contains none (or few) of the flavor notes of dark malts. But to make the two work together is the real trick, and one Widmer pulled off. The bridge comes by using hops that approximate pine tar. They're bright and clean, but they hold hands nicely with the cocoa-bitter dark malts. (I'd love to tell you which malts were used, but Widmer's website is currently doing a hinky timeout thing.) This allows both elements of the beer to express their true natures while managing to occupy the same glass. (More reviews at Ezra's new joint.) If you're at all interested in this style, buy a sixer. But if you're like me, also feel free to let the phenomenon build without your participation. I feel compelled to offer this beer at least an A- on the ratings scale, and I wouldn't be surprised to see it become the standard, at least locally.
#2- O’Beck Bahama (D)
If you're anything like me (and I wouldn't admit to that if I were you), you'll find your work full of passive verbs, ridiculous cliches, caricatures, and confusing sentences. Oh...OH! And backstory dump like a county landfill.
This Show and Tell will run for 2 WEEKS to give us a chance to catch up for the holidays.
One Filipino new citizen Angelo Marc Jandugan posted a comment defending PM Lee on his Facebook asking him to ignore Singaporeans who have been imploring him to reduce the inflow of immigrants.
Produced by Steve Barri. Strings arranged by Jimmie Haskell.
Level 1: MP Cost: 20, Duration: 66 seconds, Defense: +5%, Abnormal Status Resistance: +3%, Elemental Resistance: +3%.
“Hey…let’s have dinner!” And now…we were back to dinner.
With Red: Door
Fear seems to be another biggie. We listen to news stories of terrible things that happen to people on trains, in malls, and even at the homes of friends and we become fearful of the same things happening to our children if they are out of our sight. What we don't think about are how many people this doesn't happen to. How many teens explore life with absolutely no problems at all and have amazing experiences?
Of all the horror franchises out there, Final Destination might be the most consistent. For one thing, every film is exactly the same. But most importantly, it's guaranteed to entertain (if, that is, you're the sort of person who finds other peoples' misfortune hilarious. Me, I piss myself with LOLs every time those injury claims adverts come on TV). It's like a Faces of Death version of You've Been Framed.
One thing is for sure. Serious questions must be asked about Sheridan’s conviction for perjury.
Finally at 5am, still staring at my computer screen mind you, waiting for the stream of energy to flow words out of my fingers… I gave in and decided maybe a bath with help it all… coffee sure isn’t doing a thing!!
INN: Why do you think the life industry is losing share of the consumer dollar?
So with all that in my mind imagine my surprise at seeing the door open to the old place for the first time in years. There had been a West Indian restaurant in the space back in the 90's but they didn't last long. This particular space was a bit enigmatic because there seemed to be few attempts to rent it ( I don't recall any window signs) and I couldn't tell you when the Deli I knew and the woman who ran it closed shop because her hours of business simply became shorter and shorter until the store just didn't open anymore.
From 1958:
So when you come across metalheads or other music nerds who speak in an endless torrent of broad categorical statements, condemning genres and styles of music left and right, keep in mind you're in the presence of somebody who really doesn't have the music at heart when they speak but instead they're furiously gaming you and any other onlooker, trying to either annoy you or get you on their side. Their greatest defeat is if you completely overlook their efforts and have no opinion on them whatsoever. If you do not notice them, you do not include them in your life. If you don't include them in your life, they don't exist. They feel this acutely.
Michigan Republicans are tired of all the “anti-freedom” bans on specific behaviors in public places.
I know he is back peddling and trying to say that it was just a bad joke, but it goes further than that. I can guarantee that some people truly believe that is the way to deal with kids who “act gay”. Beating them could help them butch up a bit, but not that it will take away the effeminate thoughts. Instead you will see some of these kids terrified of being beaten changing to act a certain way in order to appease their fathers.
Robert Norton Ayton (1915-1985) was born in Bowes Park, in the London borough of Wood Green. He was the second of four brothers. In 1919 the Aytons moved to Wembley, where Robert attended Park Lane Primary School. As a boy, as well as showing an early interest and capability in art, he loved speed and designed and built model aeroplanes. His nephew Rupert (son of Robert’s younger brother William) later cherished a 12" example of one of Robert’s hand-carved propellers.
Eyes are important. We all know they are a ‘window to the soul’, and what frames this window better than dark eyeliner, often the more the better? Further, your local optician doesn’t have to remind you that eyes also do the looking. This is an important point in academia and feminist theory, with thinkers like John Berger stating that conventionally, men do the looking while women are the objects of a male gaze, not actively seeing but aware they are being looked at. If this were true, than surely a woman highlighting her own seeing eye is not only empowering, but the role reversal is titillating to the men caught in her path of vision.
My god, I feel so exposed ! For those of you who don’t know me personally, I’d love to hear which of the 7 attributes you think are true. For those of you who know me in the “real” world, don’t be tools and spoil it for everyone else.
That’s all I really need
Tribal shamans and holy men who lived as hermits in the mountains of China as early as 3500 B.C. practiced what was called the “Way of Long Life.” This regimen included a diet based on herbs and other plants; kung-fu exercises; and special breathing techniques that were thought to improve vitality and life expectancy.
One of the things I never expected blogging to do was to get me interested in photography. But from the first day Jesse Sublett showed me his digital camera in Austin and I snapped to how easy it was to use, I was hooked. That was a long time ago, back when I lived in Berlin, and the quality of the pictures sure wasn't all that great -- your phone probably takes higher-resolution pictures than my first camera did. I know mine does. But bit by bit I started figuring out how to use both a camera and the sofware that can tweak the photos to look better and overcome some of the problems not having film causes. And, since I didn't have the cost of film to worry about, I could just shoot and shoot and toss the bad ones. I sorta specialize in bad ones.
‘Well, sort of Lugg, but he…’
I'll continue.... the author of this poetry book, Eduardo Martinez y Hernandez, to the right, presented his latest book of poetry called Entre Menhires, Dolmenes, Tumulos y Calvarios..... I went, thinking this is going to be a real test for my Spanish, and listened with incredible pleasure to the gentleman in the middle talk at length about the book, his friendship with the author and his wife Margrethe Johannessen Kul, who has written the prologue to the book, and about the subject of the book...... the stones, that we, humanity, have raised through the ages to commemorate, well, ourselves, the buildings we have built and continue to build and what they mean in our lives. He spoke with surprise about the stones, that someone would choose to write poetry about stones..... it does not surprise me at all.
You hold on to the irreplaceable, the core of who that person was, the preciousness of memory. To suggest they could be replaced is an impossibility, it denies both my worth and the strength of the true memory of my love. Nobody else could ever wear that shirt, and I would never pretend to dress anyone else in it. It belonged to David.
The tree provides an apple; it’s your choice to take without giving in return or to make a conscious decision to give back. The ideal is that you give some nurturing to planet Earth, and she gives back to you by way of a life-sustaining environment.
Lighter duties, such as cooking and cleaning the surroundings, were given to other groups of prisoners, while the mutineers carried out other work, such as chopping wood and cutting logs, digging trenches and constructing dug-outs, and - most feared of all - pushing the water tank up a steep and rough road.
I speak from first-hand experience.
1325 **D-X/23/1999. “Abraham Lincoln’s Cooper Institute Address.” Illinois Political Science Association, Annual Convention, Roosevelt University, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-2000(9), above, pp. 104-16.)
What do I mean by sexualising? This is where any overt sexual activities take place on or near a designated clothing optional beach.
Gorgeous and brilliantly written, and filled with details about science, medicine, food, and madness, THE BOOK OF MADNESS AND CURES is an unforgettable debut.
Up-down in a hollow tube speechless and fine
We got checked in and almost the first person I met was George Hamilton IV. We hadn't met since the Whitby Gospel Music Convention in May, and he then introduced me to singer Gail Davies. George and his guitarist Colin (a member of Live Issue and a friend from Whitby) were singing a duet with Gail during her set.
To be honest I have been a little slack with my pork choices. I’ve been so concentrated on beef and chicken that I have allowed the occasional ham sandwich or crispy bacon rasher to slip through my fork. The good news is, I don’t actually eat a lot of pork anyway and this is another reason why I had not completely change my choice of sourcig pork. Free range pork is also hard to find. I did eventually find a free range pork stockist in Springwood but they don’t stock the kinds of cuts that I mainly eat – ham, mince and bacon.
his favorite television shows are dino dan and, more recently, dinosaur train.
Not only is brownie the cutest little goatie I have ever laid my eyes on but brownie with a bow? Come on. That's just a cute overload.
Good wishes and good cheer to all!
2.) One bad apple can really spoil the whole bunch. If the tradition misses the fact that they have a bad priest or priestess, (either morally or as just a bad teacher), that person can initiate a whole lineage of people improperly trained or with dubious morals antithetical to the rest of the tradition. Which of course causes much upset and confusion down the line when other people in the tradition meet up with them and realize what’s going on. This in turn causes a lot of drama. (And aren’t Wiccans known for their drama?)
One final point - and forgive me if this sounds defensive. As a historian, you have an obligation to be as thorough in your research as you can be. But as a writer aiming at a mainstream audience, you have an obligation to be as readable and interesting as you can be. For the mainstream writer, in any discipline, it's a balance between the two, and Bryson's Shakespeare is a perfect example of how to do it brilliantly. Just because the detail isn't on the page in front of you, doesn't mean it's not there.
Olson on Synergism and Monergism:
So long to that delicious feeling of knowing there is nowhere we have to be today.
As a Mysorean and a train passenger between Mysore and Bangalore for more than 25 years, as one who is aware of this rail segment’s history, understand its needs and track the progress of the infrastructure, my belief is we definitely don’t need the bullet train.
Ayd works with people to explore and unlock their creative ideas in ways they may never have thought possible to inspire innovation in their lives, and their business.
(And I Tiresias have foresuffered all
It looks like I have been blogging exclusive for Srivalli's Blogging Marathon for the past couple of months.With the preparation and arrival of New born at home, things are more in focus around the Lil master and hence all other things took a back seat.But then when it comes to this blogging marathon,I did not want to miss it at any cause and hence stole a few moments each day to gear up.This month for BM #13 , I have selected Postpartum diet as my theme. This seems apt now that I am being pampered with all the right and nutritive food and also I don't have to spend time in the kitchen churning out food for the blog. Mom makes these dishes and I happily put it up on the blog :)
Jarlo - $94
He booked his car in at Lindsay Saker Midrand and by mid-afternoon staff admitted they had no idea where his car was and asked him to activate his tracking device.
“Me?” Zero laughed. “No, not me. My customers on the other hand… They need something to crush their inhibitions. Something to expose their id.”
Hank: Super swear?
I have class at 2 pm, so I wake up at 11 to shower and get ready to go out. I finish at about 12, and spend an hour to have lunch/watch TV. I’m completely set and ready to go by 1:15 latest. It takes me 10-15 minutes to get to class, so the ideal time would be to leave at 1:40/1:45 but the procrastination monster in me urges me to not leave until it’s 1:55. Maybe I subconsciously enjoy pushing past crowds of people as I run to catch the tram and cursing to myself when it stops every 30 seconds. I’ll be 10 minutes late even though I wasn’t doing anything important and could’ve been on time…
Earlier, Lim accused Tunku Aziz of violating party processes when the veteran politician appeared to break ranks with the opposition by declaring in the Senate on Thursday that he opposed street demonstrations.
My favorite part about Christmas besides presents is Christmas MOVIES!!!
What a moment to savour!
No this is where the Pink Floyd you probably know and love begins. It’s a fantastic symphony, with so many twists and turns it’ll leave you feeling drained, energised, renewed and elated. The atmospherics created are immense, it starts with a sonar and then blends with so beautiful waters EP, brought to life with some signature Gimour slide and Masons rock steady vibe, it’s a wonder to behold this track. Sit down and spend 24 minutes of your life in absolute musical pleasure.
The early morning yoga goal isn’t going as well as I’d like it to. Mainly because I haven’t had a good night’s sleep in about a month. Which, let me tell you, is really starting to catch up to me. I’ve been a big ole pile of grump lately which isn’t normally me. I am not a fan of grumpy me and I’m sure no one else is either.
Well, Margaret is no longer trying to get published. She is published. The Benefactor is romantic suspense novel featuring Kate Barrett, a girl who begins receiving anonymous gifts from someone called Secret Friend after the tragic deaths of her parents when she is eight years old. Years later, after landing a challenging job and the apartment of her dreams, she is caught off guard when another package shows up at her now unlisted address. Troubled that someone is watching her every move, she sets out to discover the stranger's identity.
I have been featuring a lot of food posts lately...probably because as you've guessed, I cook a lot. I enjoy cooking, it's healthier, and often tastier than what you can buy. Today's post is no exception...I have tried a number of different granola recipes with no luck. They're either too sweet, too oat-y, not crispy enough, or they end up burning (I was just following directions!).
We received the remains of our pregnancy in a delicate box adorned with a butterfly. Inside was a hand-made blanket cradling the remains. We also received a memory box filled with a heart shaped pillow, a small journal and a tiny heart pendant. It's such a simple, sweet way to memorialize our loss and I'm appreciative of the hospital's attempt to make the healing process a little easier.
But was the “derogatory” material in the course factual? (I am currently awaiting a response from the public affairs officer at the staff college where said course was taught.)
Last night was our December meeting and holiday party for the mamas.
Here are some work in progress shots from our commercial shoot yesterday with the smashing Madness and our good friends at Gas & Electric. It was a good (if slightly bananas) day, and the Madness gents were a pleasure to work with. Cracking into post this week, so we'll put up the ad when it's finished here.
Special Award TIM RICE contribution to musical theatre.
Several months ago I was asked to help a friend by creating an Illustration based on a dream someone had of terrible future events. This dream was detailed in their book which I was given a copy of and the illustration purpose (as I was told) was to draw attention to the writer and his work so that he may be able to book more speaking engagements. I explained to my friend, who had to repeatedly inform me they knew nothing about art or how to draw a straight line, that I am not a professional illustrator but an artist and art educator and that my style is very expressionistic, and they may not like it if they wanted something highly realistic. Well, after many detailed dialogues I finally came up with some ideas and presented them. I was told that I needed to reread the dream and be more realistic with the dream illustration. So I did, and as you can see, this is my image/illustration. I was asked to add a few more details to the image.
1.a Pens, Non-Fountain Medium and High Cost Versions- You know... I kinda like my Lamy's. Rarely have they disappointed me. I never really had to do much to they to keep them flowing and it's a name that most will recognize. Here's one I like that can get picked up for about $60 or so the Lamy Studio Roller ball. The Cross Affinity is popular also or any Parker Sonnet at this level would be nice. Oh and buy a couple refills for roller balls. It really makes it easier on the person getting the gift. It's much less likely to get thrown in a drawer once it runs dry. Think about his for the business guy/ graduate/ sister in law for the match here.
they’re just a few, but I know who they are, and I am grateful to them.
I hope to share more as things progress.
Here was my moment…my chance. I decided to just say it. Just put it out there. Say it…and brace for rejection. Here it goes. Okay. Ready now.
“But the tax collector stood at a distance. He would not even look up to heaven, but beat his breast and said, ‘God, have mercy on me, a sinner.’
On the one hand, I want it to be a straightforward interview that takes five minutes and is easy. On the other hand, if I go all the way to Copenhagen for five minutes, I may die of rage. Nah, easy and straightforward is definitely the best option - I may write an angry letter later on, if I can be bothered hanging onto the fury for long enough. But then again, who has the time or energy for that?
Dr. Tanzi is one of the ten most cited researchers in AD, having co-authored over 340 research articles. He is also a co-author of a popular trade book on Alzheimer’s disease entitled “Decoding Darkness: The Search for the Genetic Causes of Alzheimer’s Disease”. Dr. Tanzi has received several awards for his work, including the two highest awards for Alzheimer’s disease research: The Metropolitan Life Foundation Award and The Potamkin Prize. He has also received the Reagan National Alzheimer’s Disease Research Award, an NIH MERIT Award, and the “Oneness of Humanity” Global Award, and is an AAAS Fellow. In 2007, he was included on the list of the “Harvard 100: Most Influential Alumni” of over 220,000 living alumni. His invited honorary lectures include a Nobel Forum Lecture, Smithsonian Institution Distinguished Lecture, and the Society for Neuroscience Public Lecture. Dr. Tanzi is the Chairman of the Cure Alzheimer’s Fund Research Consortium and serves over 40 editorial and scientific advisory boards.
On March 23rd this year, Greece signed up to a second, €130 billion loan paid mainly by other eurozone countries to reduce the country’s debt and recapitalise its banks, along with a major debt restructuring agreed with private lenders. Had it not bought all those arms from France and Germany, of course, Greece wouldn’t have a problem at all.
they will firm further on cooling.
Customer Relations Officer
Anyhoo...Easter is on it's way, yeah!!! I found another Easter basket giveaway! "Outnumbered 3 to 1" to be given away on April 7th. Yeah, I know that's after Easter but it's all good, right? I know I would love a basket full of goodies any day of the year. Granny sure does love baskets because I entered into this goodie of a contest. The basket is from Gourmet Gift Baskets so you know it's going to be chocked full of goodies galore! Well, I could babble on forever about babies and baskets or I could just leave you with a few links. To all that venture into my little corner, have a happy, blessed Easter!
they speak explicitly to those outside the fellowship–those with whom we want to share the gospel. They are not theologically useful.
lomyl tells me that i can't be afraid (knowing that whatever it is that i experience will be felt by my partners, GOOD and BAD), otherwise i will stop growing.
My favorite websites
Department of Homeland Security now has permission under the National Operations Center (NOC)’s Media Monitoring Initiative to collect and retain personal information on "journalists, news anchors, reporters or anyone who uses 'traditional and/or social media in real time to keep their audience situationally aware and informed.'” Sounds like all of us bloggers in the "liberty sphere" to me, although the "in real time" thing doesn't really apply. The story appeared on The Blaze, where reporter Tiffany Gabbay wrote:
Doesn't it sound fascinating? I totally have to buy a ticket to see this.
The mist of uncertainty will always clear
First the leaf. It's just a simple masking technique.
*My baby turned 1 year old last March. Like a year ago.
I was also curious about just what the black metal track was about, and it turns out its named for a knight who served with Joan of Arc and had a small habit of kidnapping and and brutally killing children. Good times.
Written in the style of a TV series, The First Chronicle is the beginning of a 5 part epic which follows the spiritual and emotional journey of five people; their quest to understand the universe and our place within it.
until you see the string
(And of course, in my mind, in the back of my head, I am laughing my total ass off because this is one of the funniest conversations I've EVER had with my children in MY ENTIRE LIFE!) And then it gets funnier.
This week, coincidentally, I was also working on some final tinkering on my book, What’s for Lunch? How Schoolchildren Eat Around the World, and I began thinking how many people helped and inspired me while I was writing it—friends and family, yes, but also people I’ve never even met working on bringing healthy, sustainable food to kids in places I’ve never even dreamed of going.
Cutest Couple: Lola Nolan and Cricket Bell (Lola and the Boy Next Door by Stephanie Perkins)
March 17 - Michal Gough, actor ("Batman"), 94
Do you ever feel like the fact you’re a Jew is abused subject matter in an interview?
“I’m owed some money for the two bottles in the kitchen.”
Australia has Dolphin Wild Moreton Island Cruises for some quality dolphin watching, but bottlenose dolphins can be found in most places around the world except in very cold areas.
The One X has a set of pogo pins which enable dock connectivity without having to plug in a USB cable. The Galaxy S III on the other hand supports an optional wireless charging kit (which won’t be available before September).
The Orange White & Blue horizontal tri colour flag made a comeback in 1927 when the Cape based Afrikaners inherited the macro state of South Africa - but not as a Boer flag as the Boers were conquered & marginalized due to being lumped in with the macro White population & being outnumbered by the Afrikaans speakers of the Western Cape. The flag was adopted by the Cape Dutch / Afrikaner JBM Hertzog & the National Party after a unanimous vote in Parliament. The flag was modified with a small British flag & small ZAR & OVS flags in the center of the White band. Future Prime Minister D F Malan - a Cape Dutch / Afrikaner - wanted to adopt the Orange White & Blue tri Colour as is without the 3 flag replicas at the center of the flag. Afrikaner Nationalists during the 1960s tried once again to adopt the plain Orange White & Blue horizontal tri Colour without the flag replicas at the center.
In the second instance, I discovered a bunch of clips on YT that fans had put up from their bootleg collections that showed that Clark had indeed had on his shows an incredible roster of the great “lost” bands that made two or three albums in the Sixties and then disbanded (succumbing to
A couple of minutes later, the nurse returned and did the injection appropriately. I left and had to drive towards the pharmacy in wonder of the interactions that had just occurred. I told spouseinbox and received the wonder that I had not requested the syringe to do my own injection. Actually, it would be kind of hard to twist that far for a good shot. Oh well. I may stick with the other doc-in-a-box from now on, even if I disagree with their opinions.
The affected ratings benefit from a one-notch upgrade on the standalone credit profile based a moderate likelihood of support from the U.S. government to the public housing authorities in the event of an extraordinary circumstance.
our sound. After we graduated, there was an adjustment period, where a
In the last place I look. If I go hunting for ideas, they hide (slippery little critters). But if I’m minding my own business, be it in the park, the grocery story, the carwash, inspiration can strike, and often does, in the form of falling leaves, blow-ups between cranky children and tired parents, a song on the radio. I take that experience, grind it through my own unique viewpoint, and—voila!—a book is born.
Cracking a small smile, I said, “A lady.”
Book you've learned the most from: "Catcher in the Rye." When I read it in high school I finally understood what the teacher meant by "voice." Also, I learned that, as a reader, character means more to me than plot. Nothing fascinates me more than a complex character. When I read that book I learned that a story that stays with me has to have compelling character(s). The plot action is the means of revealing them.
To try and make a long story short - Rylee was admitted into PICU and we were told we were probably going to be there for a few weeks. The doctors were fairly certain that she would need surgery and they did not want to let her go home until she had. She had to get the infection completely gone before she was able to have surgery.
Here’s just a quick look at some of them.
I really prefer the mint version. It's not too bright, compared to the pink or purple version. It's, surprisingly, more wearable than other sweet dresses, because of the "sober" color. I'm not a big fan of the black version either, I just don't think that it looks good at all, the contrast is too high, I find.
Throw everything into a blender, blend to the consistency you want and enjoy! It gets better over time, so if you can let it sit overnight, that's great, if not that's okay too!
What do you think?! Are you as enamored by it as we are?! This wall seriously makes me so giddy every time I walk into her nursery. I love the way it's all turning out!
with an interesting new soup to give back to my group.
Could I tell you once again somehow
Armed with little more than her enthusiasm, she charges headlong into London, baffling the locals in her pursuit of a new life, new love and sense of herself.
In 2010 Jonathan Sarfati launched a book in response titled, The Greatest Hoax on Earth? Refuting Dawkins on Evolution. The book was probably the most important that I have read to learn about the evolutionary theory. Sarfati quotes heavily from Dawkins’ book, and then supplies a response in the text below. He employs countless references in his objections; a rough count would be over 1000 citations from various sources. He never, surprisingly, is rude in his criticisms or is disrespectful. He seriously tries to explain the problems of evolutionary theory in a fair and objective way.
Michael Cimino never achieved again anything close to Name Your Link">The Deer Hunter in his career, nor does he ever have to. His film left an indelible mark on the minds of those who saw and those who continue to discover it. While the film will be remembered for it’s terrifying roulette scenes and for Walken’s stunning performance. It will also be known for bringing Meryl Streep to the forefront of the movie world and being the last work of John Cazale who was in some of the most pivotal movies of the decade. It was the sad and last word on a horrific time in American history. The film is not a perfect film, but all of it’s aspects together from the story and the emotions it draws on to the acting to it’s most beautifully haunting musical score, it’s a movie that couldn’t be made any better.
The morning was full of sighs and ennui, Internet time wasting, and some half-hearted soul searching. I listened to the rain, drummed my fingers on the table. I went off the rails a bit, not really sure of what to do next, what obstacles I should try to remove. It then hit me hard: it was now just over three months since I was let go from my job. Three. Months. And no prospects, yet, for a new one.
If you think you can’t lick a prize like this one, ask three SUPERVALU® (NYSE: SVU) associates who were named the winners of the company’s employee “Stone Ridge Creamery® Name Your Dream Flavor Sweepstakes.” In addition to receiving free ice cream for a year and a $500 gift card, the winning associates will have their dream flavors added to the Stone Ridge Creamery lineup and their caricatures featured on the carton. Thanks Amy Youngblood, "senior business support specialist at SUPERVALU’s innovation center in Minneapolis," for your "Red Velvet Cake" suggestion! Here's her story with how she came up with the flavor:
Pub operator Fuller Thomson are in expansion mode. After the opening of Bruadar in Glasgow’s trendy Partick, they’ve just opened another place in Edinburgh – The Southern on South Clerk Street, not that far from their existing bar The Holyrood 9A.
So we give Kasey a hug and realized we forgot her birthday card at home. I was a little mad at myself. So then Kasey said, "before we head to our seats let's take a walk upstairs in catering."
Supreme Court Associate Justice #2 Todd R. Matha
I took a few close-up photos of the miniature paintings, and in one of them I noticed I could see my reflection in the glass. The other photos don't have that, but I thought it was rather fun even though the portrait can't be seen very well.
Des Moines Iowa
“We just did that the other day. It’s 9:30 for nut’s sake. I’m beat,” I said.
Things that should have tipped me off:
Thank you, Diane, for allowing me to show your card!
P.S. Damn, I got preachy again!! This was supposed to be a lighthearted post!
they’ll never speak
nothing more, only sleep
Under the twigs of a young birch tree!
All stories apart, now let the images speak.
We can start small, by doing things that come naturally to us. And bit by bit, these small considerations and kindnesses, these seemingly small and insignificant efforts to move the needle, can and usually do spread more quickly and deeply than we ever could have imagined.
Heard a lot about dis-advantages of having a girl child from the people around me but i never met anyone actual opting for feticide maybe that thing never comes to light until a women comes out and tell people that she was forced to abort the girl child.
Jora and I have. Our first house was 100 years old and we couldn’t fathom all the possibilities. We would wonder who might have been born or even died there. Whether they liked living there. Whether they ever drove by, wondering about us.
Rise to the Challenge
that rigid compliance with the loudest voice
There is a choice between an imperative implementation and a purely functional one. Damien's code in the comment is imperative, and I found that rewriting it to introduce tail-recursion was tedious and error-prone; Okasaki's "exceptionally simple and elegant" algorithms devolve into a tangle of special cases. I opted by a purely functional implementation upon which to build an imperative, mutable interface compatible with the previous version of the priority queue. The important thing to consider is to maintain in every case the invariant for the trees. I'll use a different signature than before, one specific to this data structure:
Before I can kill him Ted says, “Rob you are needed to train Fishy remember?”
The Blonde (called Dorothy) replied, 'Twelve!'
Sully is also co-chair of the EAA (Experimental Aircraft Association) Young Eagles program which provides first time small airplane rides to youngsters. Sully is a military veteran and airline captain who has traveled all over the U.S. and the world. Unlike our past appointed SecTransportation jesters, Sully did the driving rather than the riding. He knows what is needed to traverse America, North America and the world. He knows what gets in the way and what helps. Sign him up.
Hilary Gail Mitchell (Lab) 1456
The naming of beers is something which, for many of us, is a vexing issue. For some it is just an annoyance. Sadly, for many again, it means that they don’t really know what they’re drinking, what they should be drinking or what they’re missing. Misnamed beers are the bastard creation of lazy or foolish marketing folk. Now, I’m quite sure that the parents of these marketing wunderkinds are very proud of their offsprings’ achievements thus far but surely there comes a time when a father must take a son or daughter aside and gently say something like .. “ If it walks like a duck and it talks like a duck and it smells like a duck - chances are IT’S A DUCK !! so for f#@*s sake stop calling it a goose.” A goose is like a duck, you see, but it ain’t a duck.
The story is about a street urchin named Dastan, whose life changed drastically after the King of Persia himself adopted him as his third son. Dastan then became one of the princes, had to maintain a prince’s duties, including become an infantry captain of the Persian army. By a hint from a spy, the Persian army—led by Dastan’s oldest brother, the next King of Persia—made a war campaign against a holy city. Little did they know that they would also face treachery, dark secrets, magic, elite assassins…and a beautiful princess, whose stubbornness shied that of a most uncooperative mule.
パトリック～☆
They also spit inside the food street mall wtf
“This is the first year generation that has come through and we’re doing well so there’s a system that works.”
When transcendental love of Kṛṣṇa awakens in one’s heart, even a learned scholar cannot comprehend one’s activities.
The CRP program works simply enough; it is important to remember that each state has been done. If you default on the north dakota snowmobile trail and Means Committee, issued a disturbing report on the north dakota snowmobile trail can always repair any damage that has very few places to see birds in North Dakota Senator Kent Conrad points out that smaller communities are often favored over their rural counterparts and outlying areas.
No words,
Despite my good intentions, or my lack of bad intentions, I was still hit by karmic upence when about four minutes later an enormous deer jumped over the construction fence to one side and crossed my path scaring the uttered obscenities out of my own mouth and into my balaclava. My heart may have stopped, I’m not sure.
As a day job, I am an alcohol misuse worker, offering guidance and support for people who drink too much. So maybe I shouldn't be writing this.
The packaging actually feels fabulously luxurious. It’s a cold metal tube with a lot of weight to it. The traditional bristle wand is just about the perfect size too. It’s not so small as to be fiddly but it’s not so big that I end up blobbing mascara everywhere.
I use a pizza cutter to slice the burritos into rectangles. Serve with lettuce, sliced olives, green onions, sour cream, and Avocado Lime Sauce (or you can use store-bought guacamole or avocado dip). Serves 8.
“I never know what you are thinking. Think.”
A report has said that the Anglican and Catholic churches are alarmed by the pair---well, why wouldn't they be---they haven't aligned themselves to either church, so the two major christian churches are out in the cold.
The app also makes a map of all the animals you have found and where you found them. One App Store reviewer complains that all he gets are zebras. I’m willing to trade him a dragon that scared me a little at first.
blotted out the moon
Hello all! I feel like everything around here is in a state of in between – so many fun projects on the horizon, but some dirty (and not as fun work) that needs to get done first!
( ) Fix it yourself.
Well, it was more that the audience dazzled me. When they caught on to what we were doing, their eyes lit up, and I knew I had them. Many people contributed to our character — a beautiful 27-year-old woman of French descent and a shady past. A certain fellow in her life wanted her to make them a fortune as a stripper, but she was resisting him. She wanted a simpler life, the life of a writer. She had a best friend, who loved her, and a sister who hated her. And she had a daughter she’d given up for adoption when she was sixteen.
So there is the fear of other, where is the justification for killing them?
It would be interesting to see what the ASA has to say about this. If the "positioning" of products is classed as advertising, it will give the government the power to dictate the layout of all shops—for the sake of the chiiildren, of course. And since the government has stupidly set the ball rolling by banning the advertising of so-called junk food to children, the only logical conclusion can be a ban on shops displaying sweets anywhere a child might see them—ie. everywhere—ultimately followed by plain packaging.
Viewing as a sort of temple
1 cup oat floar
My introduction to womanhood went pretty smoothly. As smoothly as major life transitions through the eyes of a ten-year old girl can go.
remaining part of 2011, which The Holy Spirit has declared to be our year of shining, keep up your zeal
And Pooja had no qualms in taking the credit for bringing Bollywood lasses to the threshold of being bold in talking relationships in public domain. She adds with a casual shrug, “We were the first ones to be open about our personal lives we were considered non serious because of this.” But it doesn’t really come as a surprise, the claim to the credit, when Pooja has never shied away from going bold whether while acting or directing. Though much in news for ” Jism 2″ Pooja dimisses talking about the film with the wave of a hand and says, “I wish to remake “Dil Hai Ki Manta Nahin” with Ranbir Kapoor and Alia (her sister) and recreate the chemistry that I shared with Aamir onscreen. It is one of the top love stories of our industry till date and one of the first road film without the tricks of foreign location,” says the actor who was in Varanasi recently.
99. “Your assumptions are your windows on the world. Scrub them off every once in a while, or the light won’t come in.” – Isaac Asimov
③・・・Sasuke(Irish setter)
The history of the Wesley family, in this aspect of the question, is interesting and instructive. Samuel Wesley of Epworth and his accomplished wife, were both descended from an unbroken succession of staunch Puritans, Puritans who held Protestant Evangelical views as to Ordination and the Sacraments, and some of whom had suffered severely from High-Church persecution. But both Samuel Wesley and his wife, in their youthful days, in disgust with the spirit of Low Dissent, renounced the views of their Nonconformist parents and conformed to the Church of England, Samuel Wesley having left a Academy to enter an Oxford College. The father, indeed, was not a Non-Juror or a Laudian High-Churchman ; but his parishioners found him to be not only an enemy of Dissent but a strict disciplinarian, and set his parsonage on fire. He was a plain and strict High-Churchman. His wife, herself an accomplished woman an admirable writer on theology holding the doctrinal views, in the main, of her noble and cultivated Nonconformist ancestors nevertheless leaned so far to the Non-Juring side as to seriously disapprove of her husband taking the oaths of allegiance to William. Their sons all went to Oxford; Samuel, the eldest son, was through life a high Tory, and not without reason was suspected of Jacobite proclivities. He was not, however, a Non-Juror, but a moderate High-Churchman. John Wesley, when he entered the University, held views similar to those of his elder brother, and was of a bright and gay temper, and not “righteous overmuch.” But he read Law s Serious Call, and became his disciple. For many years, Law, the Non-Juror, was to him as a prophet, and under his influence John Wesley, while at Oxford, became an extreme High-Churchman, holding views nearly resembling those held by Keble a century later, except that he did not believe in the “conversion of the elements in the Holy Supper,” to use his own phrase, or sympathise with any degree of Mariolatry. It was not till years afterwards that Wesley came to abandon his High-Church views, or to understand and admire the eminent goodness of not a few of the persecuted Puritan Confessors in Stuart times. Charles Wesley admired and followed in his doctrine his brother John, but, with a poet’s temperament, retained to his death his admiration for Charles I., and never, like his brother, became a broad Evangelical in his tolerance for orthodox Dissent and his sympathy with the best Puritanism of the Stuart period. When, in his History of England, John Wesley gave a discriminating estimate of Charles I., such as no Non-Juror or Jacobite could have accepted, Charles remonstrated with his brother on his too little favourable judgment of the “Martyr,” and John made answer that he could not in conscience revise his estimate of the king, or “speak less evil of him.” Notwithstanding what he afterwards spoke of as the “vehement prejudice” of his education, Wesley totally abandoned, in middle life, after reading Lord Chancellor King’s book on the Primitive Church, and Archbishop Tillotson’s writings on the same subject, all his old Oxford High-Church principles, as his whole subsequent course, his Journals, and in particular his Ordinations for America and Scotland abundantly prove. He did this, how ever, without becoming in any sense or degree a Dissenting Nonconformist.
The show was really good. They band all seemed to have a good energy and the crowd was super into it, people were dancing and singing and even lots of crowd-surfing, surprisingly. I found the show to be pretty solid, overall.
The Prius c (called the Aqua in Japan) has certainly proven popular, selling 1201 units in its first three days on sale, a figure that (as Toyota likes to rub in) bests both Chevy Volt and Nissan LEAF sales for the entire month of February, 2012. In fact, it’s selling so well in Japan that allocations for the U.S. market have been cut, making a Prius c a bit difficult to find at the moment.
FYI - your partner will realise this, my fiance hated it, if he kissed me unawares he could taste nothing but this for hours..oops sorry sweets!
A key sticking point remains how much to raise the debt ceiling: Democrats want it raised enough so the issue won’t come up again until after the November 2012 election. Boehner has said that is impossible; he wants it raised in two, smaller increments.
After being quoted 60-90mins, an hour later, our orders arrived! This is fast enough for me considering where my order came from. I was really not expecting a whole lot in terms of how the food would look when it got to us because just the delivery experience from the usual fastfood restos where sauces would drip out of the styro or the coke just spilling everywhere. But lo and behold, every single item -as soon as we unveiled them from layers of foil, paper wrappers and styro – would look like they were brought out straight from a kitchen!
Instead of your usual picture, I will be posting our latest video. That’s right… I said VIDEO!! I changed my plans to make sure that the three videos coming up early in the new year, will be spectacularrrr… so this one is just a farewell to 2011.
And it’s good to have more debate, more conversations.
Women will ALWAYS, ALWAYS give you a hint or clue as to whether they are attracted to you in some way or as more than a friend. And it’s usually IMMEDIATLEY. But the issue is, it’s rarely ever directly communicated (verbally) by a woman as to whether she likes you in a romantic way or not. I believe this is nurture for women b/c women are raised to be nice, caring and to avoid hurting people’s feelings.
Those who speak in a tongue build up themselves, but those who prophesy build up the church. Now I would like all of you to speak in tongues, but even more to prophesy. One who prophesies is greater than one who speaks in tongues, unless someone interprets, so that the church may be built up.” ( 1 Cor 14;1-5)
I keep the Daily 5 labels in the front of each pocket so kids know which activity they are completing. I also staple one of those labels onto the activities so they make it back into the correct pocket.
Short Shag
Make sure everything is neat in the frame – no clutter, exposed power cords, or awry curtains – and don’t be afraid to move furniture around to highlight a particular view or a positive aspect of the room. You want to make the picture “pop,” and you may need to rearrange furniture to really make that happen.
That you just don’t care.
As regards my own childhood I can still be bitter at times. Or maybe regretful is a better word. I still think Larkin's poem gives excellent advice even if I failed to follow it. Mea culpa.
I grew up near a creek, and in the summer it was our local hangout. Us kids would trek down to Tygart Creek and hike and wade and whatever else, we had the place to ourselves! On a few occasions you would spy a snake on top the water coming downstream and have to get out until it passed by, and once I stepped on a mud puppy and that was kind scary, but try to get my 20 year old near lake water...she freaks! Actually she never grew up near a creek, always had an above-ground pool at her dad's house, so she was spoiled. Also, her fear stems from this show called "River Monsters" and she swears up and down weird things could live in murky water and if she can't see the bottom she's not going in....
Besides, with over thirty-thousand miles on the road every year... I could probably take a job closer to home... if there is one in the current economy... for less money and be dollars ahead of burning through a vehicle with 150,000 or more miles on it every five years. I'm just trying to go back and read the signs I've been ignoring.
Fuck yeah! Except!
And a stone cold feeling inside
If the SPL permits the game to be played on that basis, then, in effect, Mr Miller has won.
His favorite toys are trains.
These freak hot summers all happened within the last two decades. And nineteen of the hottest 20 years have occurred since 1980.
Of my head
“Mr. Cromitie had told the informant that he was upset about the war in Afghanistan and that that he wanted to “do something to America.” Mr. Cromitie stated “the best target” — the World Trade Center — “was hit already,” according to the complaint.” NYT added
ever stronger 'each to each.' This is still my primary goal.
the kiddie party on Sunday.)
1) Focus more on the idea of an “altar ego”
British scientific heads of facilities were apprehensive when the respected young lord - the Government's security man - would ring at short notice and make an appointment to check on a laboratory. His imperious demeanour, high intelligence and diligent determination to understand every development in detail, put all who came under his scrutiny in awe and admiration of him. On occasions he actually stole equipment, examined it and sent it back by special messenger to the research centre concerned, with a warning that security should be tightened. Sir Mark Oliphant, one of the great scientists of the era, told me in an interview in January 1994 he experienced this late in 1942 when Rothschild secretly removed a piece of radar equipment from his Birmingham University laboratory.
Joining us on stage, Texas Congressman Ron Paul.
Yup. Start again. Like, from the very beginning. A very good place to start.
- Found notes/poems/words i wrote
Is it too early to ask about Richard Ford?
See, darkness covers the earth
HOLY FUCKING CHRIST
I smiled even more helpfully and said, “It’s pretty easy. All you have to do is click your heels together three times and say, ‘There’s no place…’” They started laughing, and then I explained how to get to Building B.
Patton's discipline is intended to create that condition of initiation - there's still going to be the odd soldier here and there who hasn't yet realized that mom's not coming, that no bell is going to sound signifying the end of dodge ball -- who resists the comfort of berserker madness and still clings to civilized fear, who thinks clinging to the crumbling shards of his childhood persona will strengthen rather than destroy him. In the end all the military drilling and exhaustion is partly for this purpose - to weaken the ego's dogmatic hold, so you can actually be molded into a killing machine who can then run into the path of flaming bullets--against all common sense and instinct of self-preservation. When you're more scared of running away than you are to fight, cowardice evaporates in the crossfire. But as long as one soldier can get away with pretending to be sick to get out of combat, the morale of the whole unit is in jeopardy. Hence a little bitch-slap. However, though I realize all that now, as a child I used to think Patton a bully for bullying sake, and apparently so did the bulk of America - then as a hippie I thought he was existentialist and square; now I get it. Patton must necessarily be excused from any consequences that may stem from disrespecting boundaries, for the best defense is a good offense and therefore the mark of a good general. Eisenhower also shows himself a good general in the way he masterfully plays up the slapping event up to deflect Nazi attention from D-Day (he had Patton scoping locations in Turkey, tricking the Germans sure into thinking he would invade there, and that the slap incident was a flimsy smokescreen - double reverse psych!).
It’s so easy to get caught up in the status quo. To just keep doing everything like it’s always been done; to begin each week with little expectation and less enthusiasm.
It’a ever-so-easy to make so you can can safely get your little helpers in the kitchen to give a hand, wrapped in baking paper it makes a delightful Xmas treat to gift your friends with and, above all, it is utterly and over-indulgently delicious.
Anyway, back to the one in London, this time there's no prizes for getting it right, just the satisfaction of knowing you were right and are able to prove to others on the internet that they are wrong.
From reading one book for one small assignment, I ended up writing another big assignment, and I'm currently working on my third piece for Runner's World. And I got to talk to Michael Palin! Yes, that Michael Palin!
Tuesday Tasting is a regular feature of Lyke2Drink that explores some of the best beers, wines and spirits on the market. This week we sample a Belgian-style beer from a South Carolina brewery.
“Stop crying, Iqra. Stop!” she wiped her face and walked towards her balcony. On bad days like these, she used to walk over to her balcony, sit on her rocking chair and contemplate theories on Life. She asked herself many questions, hoping that the answers would ultimately lead her to some conclusion and solve her uncertainties. And even today, she chose to do the same.
Those stripes were painted with this LIQUID GOLD IN A CAN
you can't see
If you are having any technical difficulties, or have any other feedback on these meetings, please contact Kristin Courington, 720-288-1615.
And finally it's time to announce the guest designer who we would love to have join us for Challenge #12, remember we will be choosing a GD with every new challenge so if you weren't successful this time there will be plenty more opportunities. So we would love to invite as our GD for Challenge #12....
-I painted my toenails an awful color of pink but I'm too lazy to change it right now. So, if you see me out...just know that I know its bad.
My guess is that he smokes a decent amount of pot each day. I don't even know what a decent amount of pot is. A teaspoon? A Ziplock bag full? I'm exaggerating but you get my point. I'm clueless. Often when he comes by, he has "high" eyes.
Harry Carney (baritone sax)
Have you been honest with God or are you harbouring some
In my IPA a Day series, which beer was number nine?
“I want him to sing ‘Wonderwall’! ” he shouted before resuming.
“If you are a woman of childbearing years, get vaccinated,”says Snyderman.
Climbing. Which means for the first time I had to climb with a backpack (which I did not know… so I didn’t exactly pack light) pull and manage gear. It was quite, interesting to say the least. The first thing I did was fall and swing 5′. I was getting cams and tools, stuck on my pants, and all the gear was dangling awkwardly between my legs. I now know how guys must feel, and am glad for once to be a girl. On the first pitch of The Waltz I got off route and ended up making the climb about a 5.9 instead of a 5.6. However, by the second pitch of The Waltz the gear management went much more smoothly, and I was more comfortable climbing with the pack. After we rappelled off the second pitch of The Waltz we bush-whacked our way to Skyline. I would like to take this opportunity to point out that I was tricked! Mike told me that Skyline was 2 pitches of easy climbing. Therefore, by the end of the second pitch I was very ready to be done, take my uncomfortable climbing shoes off and tackle the hike out. So you can imagine my surprise when I get to the end of the second pitch and Mike says, “So the next couple pitches are really easy…” I was thinking: excuse me, what!? You have got to be kidding! Yet, somehow, I was able to haul my poor body up the rest of the way to the top (the view from Skyline pictured above left). We then hiked out the four or five miles to the car, drove back to Bozeman and had a much deserved burger and milkshake at Burger Bobs. A burger and coconut shake has never tasted so good. I literally couldn’t move on Sunday, and the bruises and scrapes are still healing. Somehow, despite everything, climbing still remains fun, and is worth all the trouble.
On top of the relentless calls we have management chasing us to turn round quicker and be available for more jobs. At the end of the day we are a demand driven service and the public need us in times of illness or injury…but…we are getting sent to more and more and more and more and more (you get the picture) and more crap!!!!!!!!
I don’t speak from the perch of privilege here. University will, I fear, be financially beyond my own sons, both of whom may well have thrived on the opportunity it afforded them. I hate the political priorities that bring that about but I hate what Trenton Oldfield did last Saturday even more. Partly because people who can’t see the target shouldn’t be throwing punches and partly because his little stunt ultimately achieves only one thing: affirmation that inverted snobbery is every bit as pathetic as the prototype.
Tired, sleepy and aching all over, but have to write this down to get it out of the mind and system before I can sleep. So here is my account of Bersih 3 written at 11pm on 28 April 2012.
I have my Associate’s Degree, & I’m starting for my Bachelor’s in a few weeks. I’m gonna be (hopefully) making some pretty decent money after graduating; you better be able to contribute equally. I’m no sugar mamma, I’m not here to support you. You need to have ambitions to do better for yourself too & actually get some type of career – not just floating from job to job. Now, if something happened later down the road where my man loses his job or something, of course I would be willing to help support while he got back on his feet. But then again, he better be actively & seriously looking for a new job!!! I know too many couples where the man loses his job then just sits on his ass for a year or more. Seriously??! No deadbeats allowed in my life.
needless to say, it was all cleaned up and everyone survived the diaper bombing.
11. I Forgot To Be Your Lover
The goals I hope to achieve have been achieved before, so nothing is new really. Nevertheless, they will be big accomplishments for someone like me because I know where I have been.
Patriots WR Chad Ochocinco, @ochocinco: “My prayers and condolences to the family of one of the NFL’s greatest linebackers to ever play the game.. Junior Seau.. R.I.P”
So maybe he didn't say it exaclty like that. But he was clearly getting frustrated with the fact that I was so desperately working to complicate a really very simple process.
Your confidence in the truth wavers. If you don’t know yourself, what do you know?
To date, the group has charted 17 singles onto the Billboard Top-40 Charts.
We aren't having our Halloween bonfire with our teens and their friends until the weekend after Halloween, so I still have time to decide on treats for the party. If you are rushing around this week trying to figure out a homemade treat to make, try one of the following recipes. I'm going to make at least two of the following bars, plus I'll pick up candy after Halloween when it's marked down. Teens eat a lot, so I may have to make 3 or 4 pans now that I think about it:)
”It’s not an apple to welcome teachers back to school, but a cup of coffee. In recognition of teachers, Starbucks is offering school teachers, grades K-12 a complimentary tall cup of brewed coffee on Mondays during the month of September.”
Want to see how it's going to work with the rest of the nursery? Here's the design board, which I've tweaked to include some of my more recent design choices:
But fire and water weren't Lawrence's only distresses. Sometimes he had to fear his own constituents.
Anyway, here she is ...
The album is a soundtrack & a classic & opera but was overlooked in the Lovers & Duets the February special, oops. The album is well put together ~ from a time when they reviewd ll the characters, the play, the music history on a double wide feast for the eyes.
We men – go crazy during women’s period.
Can I make it up to you in jewelry when next I see you? Somehow, methinks you won't say no...
The term digital SLR stands for single lens reflex. It is so called because the SLR cameras use a mirror that is placed behind the lens. Although SLR cameras for capturing still images have been in use for quite some time, the ones that could capture both the stills and the videos were introduced in 2008.
The flower I used is just one I found on the net. Lion Brand has some and a few other sites.
Far too many parentheses in that last paragraph. Nevertheless, I am a physics nerd, and ridiculously so. Just last night, stumbleupon produced me with a simple quiz ‘How much do you know about the theoretical principles of Quantum Physics?’, or something along those lines. Now, picture a really sad kitten. A REALLY sad kitten. Surely you know of those lolcat pictures of the crazy happy kittens – well, my face went from sad kitten to psycho elated kitten in an instant. Seriously, the amount of elation I felt from being able to answer 10 rudimentary questions of particle physics theories is ridiculously embarrassing.
Several micro-brewers make bourbon barrel stout or employ used bourbon barrels in other ways. Bourbon Barrel Foods, in Louisville, ages soy sauce and other products in them. A cigar company in Kentucky ages its tobacco in them.
Is not the cup that holds your wine the very cup that was burned in the potter's oven?
Jules Strauss goes to Princeton University. She is approached one day while at the mall. A man tells her about a opportunity where she can make a lot of money. The catch is, Jules would have to give away her eggs. The man he is from the Princeton Fertility Clinic. Jules agrees to sell her eggs. She is really doing it for her father. He is an alocohtic. The money would help pay for him to go to rehab.
success, like happiness, cannot be pursued; it must
“You have to make a living,” she protested.
Often times we see ‘Preachers of God’s Word’ claiming they have power to heal, power to perform wonders, etc. Be assured that if even God has truly given them those gifts, they will fall in no time. The God we serve hates pomposity and will not allow his children to disrespect Him. Pride can be likened to self idolatry. Also remember that pride is one of the Seven Capital Sins! Avoid it.
Last week two of my dear friends were accepted as candidates for ordination in the Evangelical Presbyterian Church. One was passed by the committee without any difficulty. The other was required to complete an extra step by writing a statement in defense of the biblical basis for being called to ordained ministry. One was accepted immediately. The other was accepted only by secret ballot.
While we were at my parents house we decided to have a little cake for SM. We haven't really given him sweets yet, so I wasn't quite sure what to expect. We gave him his own little cupcake and this is what happened...
Nice cover, too. I’ve never seen the real green flash so I don’t know if the cover represents it accurately, but it looks good to me.
BERNARD C. WEBBER will be the Coast Guard workhorse for the critical missions of port, waterway and coastal area security, illegal migrant and contraband interdiction, search and rescue, and national-defense operations (to name just a few). The design and engineering of this ship is truly first-class. Her new and improved C4ISR systems are fully interoperable with existing Coast Guard assets, as well as DoD and Homeland Security systems, enabling her to better support a full range of missions. In addition to the modernized communications systems, she features a cutter boat stern ramp which can launch and recover a 7.9 meter cutter smallboat used for its many operations.
In stark contrast to the lies by BP CEO Tony Hayward in May 2010 that the impact of the spill would be "very, very modest", Deepwater Horizon is one of the worst oil spills in history. It amounts to nothing less than a monstrous crime against nature by capitalism, specifically U.S. and British imperialism. The only way humanity can prevent such hellish environmental catastrophes in the future is for the working class in the U.S. and around the globe to rise up and get rid of capitalism, once and for all, through the socialist revolution. The earth's ecosphere will not survive more than a few decades unless the working class takes power and establishes socialism on a worldwide scale.
Unlockable Keys
"Wherefore if thy hand or thy foot offend thee, cut them off, and cast them from thee: it is better for thee to enter into life halt or maimed, rather than having two hands or two feet to be cast into everlasting fire. And if thine eye offend thee, pluck it out, and cast it from thee: it is better for thee to enter into life with one eye, rather than having two eyes to be cast into hell fire."
In his 1995 Nobel acceptance speech Heaney noted that his writing, like his life, has been “a journey where each point of arrival … turned out to be a stepping-stone rather than a destination,”[11] but every journey has to start with a first step, a stepping away from some place and that place is one we have likely been used to calling ‘home’. I don’t know where Heaney’s poetry goes from here. I do know he becomes more of a political poet but that’s about it. Suffice to say that this exercise has been a worthwhile one and I think I might be keen to see where he goes after this. What I do find interesting is that the metaphor of “stepping-stones” was one he used as far back as 1974 in his essay ‘Feeling into Words’ talking about his early attempts at poetry:
Assuming you’re not a minister, priest or pastor, have you ever taken your Bible to your workplace? I haven’t.
The 2008 Predator Zinfandel was a very drinkable, fruity medium-bodied red that was a great lead in to the meal. I almost didn't choose this wine because, frankly, it sounds like one of my son's games. The vineyard is sustainable and they use ladybugs and predator mites to combat the destructive aphids instead of pesticides, hence the name Predator. Nice.
3. To present you…before the presence of his glory with great joy
echoing sounds
ON THE "PRADA LOOK"
Director:
PLACE: Agency for Persons with Disabilities
The dreaded synopsis
Day 1
Rodrigo Borgia, played by Jeremy Irons, schemes his way into being elected Pope Alexander VI. His seat is unsecure, however. He must plan cleverly and keep his wits about him to maintain his Papacy. Cue advantageous marriages for his daughter Lucrezia, who ends up married to the nastiest piece of work in all of Europe; and his youngest son Joffre, who at the age of 13 is married to a woman who is easily about 20. Rodrigo himself has a clever mistress Guilia Farnese; she earns the trust of both the Pope and his daughter Lucrezia. His elder son Cesare and his condottiero Michelotto spy and murder to keep the Borgia family in power. Rodrigo’s middle son, Juan, is the head of his Papal army and rather a naughty boy.
Gods yes!!! I need the money so bad. I'm failing at paying some of my medical bills. However, it is seriously taking away from other things. Writing has fallen to the wayside the most. Half the time I get home (around 11 p.m.) and either just want to veg in front of the T.V. or hop on to EverQuest 2. (It's worse than World of Warcraft.)
True. It had caused a royal mess and In-Soo had been responsible. “Why do you think he would do such a thing?” Micha asked.
He knew just where she was headed in her Mercedes. Uptown via the interstate in thirty-five minutes. The express elevator to the Fifty-second floor at Fraser, Chew and Poe. Nine or ten hours and home by 6:30. Trey was usually at least a half hour behind her and most nights more.
Another thing that doesn’t work is the clash of tones. The trailer made the movie look like a comedy that the family could all enjoy, but with very dark moments and lots of sex it just doesn’t really mesh. Barnabas as a vampire who has trouble adjusting to the new era is funny, but how can you laugh at a character who murders people in cold blood. I think this does come
Very clean on the nose with a slight sweetness, with a palate of creamy potato.
It might seem like a warm fuzzy group hug, but there's a nasty side to making such a blanket statement.
idea of the value of money.”
But like all products, its success is driven by consumer demand.
adore-or-abhor proposition, it's her voice. For some it's swoonily
I mean, kill me now.
If you are interested in becoming a volunteer, the Volunteer Lawyers Project in partnership with the Real Estate section of the Boston Bar Association will be having a training on “Trying a case in Boston Housing Court.” The esteemed panel includes the Honorable Jeffrey Winik, First Justice of the Boston Housing Court, Stefanie Balandis, Greater Boston Legal Services, Joanna Allison, Volunteer Lawyers Project and, of course, Chris Saccardi, the Law Office of Christopher T. Saccardi.
A Personal Good Friday
The nine cargo aircraft will begin operations in April, said Maj. Michelle Lai, communications officer for the Air Force’s 89th Airlift Wing. “They’ll stand down in November 2012,” she said...
As I mentioned, the colour payoff of Gumdrop is very light. Which, seeing as how this is a purple, is a good thing so as to not make your lips entirely lilac. The payoff is pretty much the same whether you apply it once or multiple times – colour doesn’t build up dramatically:
Movement: He likes to kick my bladder a lot these days and make me think I'm going to pee myself.
A quick nod and eye contact with the 50+ lady clad in blue blouse affirmed to the crowd that I was next to her in the invisible line. Patience is not one of my virtues, so I decided to do my groceries first after affirming my place in the invisible line. I returned half an hour later, just before the French Baker employees started clearing the tables and chairs for the upcoming battle for half priced bread.
- 2 tablespoons of soy sauce (more/less, adjust to your taste)
Brigette Ann Esposito, 34, New York, N.Y.
I AM GRATEFUL FOR:
God roars through His Prophets… out of Zion (the Church)… God speaks through men… Amos was a layman… He could speak honestly and forcefully about what God was saying. If he had been a theologian, God would have by-passed him. Why… because he would have relied on his own wisdom and his own opinions. God is going to roar through men and women like Amos… the layman… our nation’s leaders are not listening to the preachers today. Just wait… The laymen are coming who will speak like Stephen, and the politicians will not be able to resist the Holy Ghost that is in them. Today, people prophesy in the churches the word that they should be prophesying on the Capitol steps. Believers are hearing what God is saying, but the politicians are not. The politicians are not in the church. The prophets are prophesying in the wrong places. They need to testify
The shortlist in full:
When I bend down to put some loose coin in his begging cup, he grabs needfully at my sleeve, but his grip is weak. I pull my arm free and straighten up. I’m trying not to wretch at the smell.
I don't know how the yarn turned out yet. It hasn't finished drying. It should be dry tonight. Right now it's hanging out on the clothes line in my basement. It's not completely solid, which is what I wanted. Some parts are a bit more saturated than others, and I really like that look. So hopefully my sister will like a red cardigan... because that's what she's getting!
The main problem with this Great Realignment is that it could take a generation or more to complete. And with the vote on the right split, the Leftists and their Muslim allies will have a free run in the corridors of power.
Controversial aspects include who’ll run the exchange, how much power insurance companies will get, and who’ll pay for it.
Thank you Father for the blessing of motherhood,
And yet, as worthy of mockery as this is, there’s a serious side. The Examiner’s Philip A. Klein calls this vandalism:
I’m sure you’re all wondering at this point how I deal with this. Honestly, some times I don’t know what to do. I can try my best to not watch shows that feature rape jokes, or movies with explicit rape scenes. But I can’t always control the news. And as a feminist activist, rape is something I have to hear about a lot. And weeks like this often end with me having increased flashbacks. I wish I had more advice to give, so that I could tell all the other survivors out there how to handle it. If any of you readers have advice, please share it, I know I welcome it. But sometimes, the most important thing is to remember to just keep breathing.
Thank goodness I stay at home with my daughter because, well, I have a confession... get ready....
Courtney Upshaw, DE/LB, Alabama
I feel listless sometimes
Me: Who? That is the point, I don't know who it is.
The report does not acknowledge that much user-generated content incorporates the content of others, including ‘professional content’ (such as music), and the role of this incorporated content in attracting viewers (and thus revenue for the provider).
As the cold Winter lingers in the Hampton Roads area and we desire Spring with all her pollen, hay fever, and uncertain insect population to bridge us into another warm season, I find my thoughts turning to the sea, to piracy, and to a book review. I have also considered renaming the blog to Summer Squash, temporarily, but I remain undecided there.
Other Hindraf activists I spoke to similarly backed the findings of the informal survey of who (ethnicity wise) had taken part. The usual suspects from the Indian-majority Parti Sosialis Malaysia made their presence felt but it was the conspicuous Indian absence that spoke volumes.
8 year old me wanted to be a veterinarian, then I shadowed a vet for a day. A dog knee surgery ended that dream.
I feel lucky. Blessed to be part of such an amazing group of woman, I know they all care so deeply about one another (and me). Proud to know that Shannon is feeling the love during the terrible time. This group of woman is so amazing and they know how to come together when ever anyone is in need and Shannon deserves nothing less right now.
What? Not use my beads after I had worked so hard on this project! What?
It is well known that creativity is important in all aspects of life. It not only stimulates the creation of new and innovative ideas but also plays a large role in students’ development, especially during high school. As defined by the National Advisory Committee on Creative and Cultural Education, creativity is an “imaginative activity fashioned so as to produce outcomes that are both original and of value.”
Prejudice and paranoia never survive the rigours of open debate, and the horrors of the massacre in Norway should not be allowed to obscure this important truth.
Hmmmmm - I fear I might be getting a bit boring. A bit too birdy nerdy, perhaps? It seems that recently I have only posted photos of birds. Birds, birds and more birds. Admittedly, they are all very beautiful birds, but I fear I may be becoming a one-subject wonder. Or perhaps a one subject bore?
89. If you were reading my blog when I posted the "Weight a minute" blog....I still plan on sharing my favorite healthy food choices with you. I have even found more since then!
Nothing like craft beers to take away the pain, chickens.
When we landed it was the craziest thing. I don't think I've exited a normal 747 onto the tarmac before, and I know for sure I've never waited for customs and baggage claim in a giant open air shed before. And I liked it! So did Landry. :)
Light Refreshments and some Gelato, of course, bringing food or treats is very much appreciated and enhances your karma!
After that we went over to Old Town Spring - which is a little section of town (the old part) where it's all renovated little homes which are now quaint little shops. We ate fried twinkies and fried oreos and had quiche on a patio cause the weather was wonderful. I paid $4 for an unmarked white chocolate haystack and then we came home to get ready for the play.
I just need to squeeze a photo of me somewhere in my post. HAHAHHAA. Okay, so I decided to place it here.
If you want to be up to date on the latest in the NCAA, including college coaches and players, then subscribe to my Twitter feed @MerfyMerf.
What I love about it is how it talks about the potential we have as children of God. We are all His children and can do so much if we put our trust in Him. I love the encouraging words and the great reminders of what we can become.
Here in Nicaragua, a “full bus” isn’t the same thing as a “full bus” in Seattle. Or probably anywhere in the States.
Learning to Cherish Him
The canyon received the average year’s worth of precipitation within the first 4 hours after the rainstorm began. “The gauging station at the mouth of the canyon recorded peak flow of 883 cubic meters per second, four times higher than the previous record flood.”
"These guys make it their business to actively seek out infringing content/links/torrents on behalf of their clients, and issue takedown notices: something they claim that, because they specialise in it and because they have considerably automated the seeking-out process, they can be significantly better (and cheaper/more efficient) at than the average content owner.
I've noticed that Dave Kuzminski has come under fire lately, too. Dave, you've got my sympathy. It's really tough to be out there trying to help people, only to have them turn around and whack you on the shin for your efforts.
who should reject outmoded concepts of sin and guilt.
stage. Robert Cray was jamming, sweat
With my guitar beatin’ rhythm to the click-clack of the wheels
Mary Art, research director of LIMRA’s technology in marketing and distribution research, is responsible for new research in the technology area.
I put my pea back in the freezer.
Thus we are very much concerned about the Buddha being called an Indian. It would have been much better had the narrator said the Buddha was born in present Nepal’s Lumbini. This is due to the Indian media misinforming the world. Even India spending millions of dollars to construct duplicate Lumbini to prove its provocation. Now, therefore, Nepalese and Buddhists are uniting to defense this kind of arm twisting. There were lots of campaigns against Newsweek Editor Fareed Zakaria when he mentioned in his book “The Post American World” that Buddha was an Indian.
The sentiment is from my stash, and I thought it was perfect for this little card....it's layered onto another scrap that was cut with a Nestie label......layered onto a matching border piece that has been wrapped with pink ribbon......
I tainted restraint, relationships and trust;
It all has to do with the temperature of the butter.
I recently read a couple books about the case of Mary Rogers, a young woman in 19th century New York who was brutally murdered and possibly raped. Or maybe she’d had an abortion and the abortionists disposed of her body in a panic. In any case, she wound up dead in the waters off the shore of New Jersey. There were several different suspects and theories — a jealous fiance, gang murder, abortion gone wrong? The case was never solved.
Saturday, March 26 - Museum of Contemporary Art - Chicago, IL
He should have been drummed out long ago, not constantly rewarded with promotion.
bringing in
Examples of intellectualization: A) Suppose John has been brought up by a strict father, and he feels hurt and angry as a result. Although John may have deep feelings of hatred towards his father, when he talks about his childhood, John may say: ‘Yes, my father was a rather firm person, I suppose I do feel some antipathy towards him even now.’ John intellectualizes; he chooses rational and emotionally cool words to describe experiences which are usually emotional and very painful. B) A woman in therapy continues to theorize her experience to her therapist – ‘It seems to me that being psycho-analyzed is essentially a process where one is forced back into infantilism…intellectual primitivism’ – despite knowing that she ‘would get no answer to it, or at least, not on the level I wanted, since I knew that what I was saying was the “intellectualizing” to which she attributed my emotional troubles.’ C) A person who is heavily in debt builds a complex spreadsheet of how long it would take to repay using different payment options and interest rates, rather than attempting to understand and then stop his urge to overspend his money. D) A man with ‘an ambiguous conflicted relationship with a female colleague…generated a list of 12 different thoughts and descriptions of their previous interactions. One of these items, titled ‘Info on her,’ had its own list of 12 facts.’ Thus he ‘controlled his feelings by compiling facts and ‘data.’ His problem list and the lists within the list were a way of gaining an illusion of control over difficult feelings.’
My apologies, dear readers.
Ready to Ship In 3 Business Days
did y'all have a good easter weekend?
Here it is you vultures:
One of the most beautiful historic sites in the nation, Juniper Springs is the centerpiece of a recreation area in Florida's Ocala National Forest.
This is worth "thinking about", but I don't believe one has to think too hard to come to the "right" conclusion - it's almost unbelievable (scary, would be more appropriate) that this could happen!!
HP is famous and the garage is extremely famous as being the "Birthplace of Silicon Valley." It's actually listed on the register of historic places by the US Department of the Interior. Everywhere you read about the garage online will say tours are not available but you are welcome to take photos of the exterior of the property.
Next thing you know, it was time to meet up with Sarah and Robert for our cinco dinner!
Slowly but surely the village will get complete. Hopefully they continue with development and growth… although I’m running out of room on the mantle. This year, we had to expand to the shelves with the newest additions...
“That’s where genius comes in,” Pukey said. “We just change to road signs for a couple of days. When that road crew comes we’ll just point them ten miles that-a-way.” Pukey pointed East.
An update on my sister. She saw the surgeon yesterday and is set up to have her gall bladder removed on the 15th which is next Tuesday. The surgeon said he's not worried about the polyps since they'll be removing the whole gall bladder anyway. That was a relief to hear for sure. Now she has an appointment with her ob/gyn on Friday the 12th. Hopefully that's just follow up and there's still nothing going on with her for that stuff. Her biopsy came back clear that he did a week or so ago so that was a relief too.
Tribute To Martha
13 create
The day was filled with a self guided walking tour of Portland (museums, shops, nature, etc.) finally ending with an attempt to go to the 24th annual Oregon Brewer's Festival. Bad mistake... There were 85 beer vendors at the festival and each had a line 100+ deep to get a beer. WOW! So we decided to come back to the festival on Sunday afternoon, hoping for smaller crowds.
There are lots of places on the internet where writers gather: I've written some general posts about them here. Many writers' message boards include a discussion forum and an area where writers can receive feedback and criticism on their work, but some of them are far better than others: it all depends, I think, on what the writers who populate the place are like. If a writers' site has a good proportion of accomplished, well-published writers in its membership then the advice there is likely to be above average; if the members are all aspiring writers with little or no experience of publication, or there's a high proportion of vanity-published writers among the membership, then it's very likely that the advice that's on offer isn't going to be quite so good.
Not only that but Isaiah 7:14 was actually fulfilled in Isaiah 8 with the birth of Isaiah's son Maher-Shala-Hash-Baz, so was it wrongly quoted in Matthew? No. This was one example of the typological correspondences described, in this case, between the birth of one child and the birth of the Messiah.
The child within me runs to her
Wi usquebae (Whisky), we'll face the devil! -
When I opened the box, I just felt this overwhelming urge to laugh. It was something else, sitting there and holding this piece in my hands and just feeling the warmth coming from it.
It rises to the surface in raging waves of anger, exposing the heart
Applying these standards to BMC’s charges against Paymentech properly results in a finding of no infringement. Although BMC proffered evidence to establish some relationship between Paymentech and the debit networks, the magistrate and the district court both concluded that this evidence was insufficient to create a genuine issue of material fact as to whether Paymentech controls or directs the activity of the debit networks. Specifically, the magistrate and district court found BMC’s evidence that Paymentech provides data (debit card number, name, amount of purchase, etc.) to the debit networks, absent any evidence that Paymentech also provides instructions or directions regarding the use of those data, to be inadequate. BMC argues that instructions or directions can be inferred from the provision of these data, or that the data themselves provide instructions or directions. But, having presented no evidence below to support either theory, BMC is not entitled to such an inference with respect to the debit networks that would allow it to survive summary judgment. The evidence before the magistrate and the district court to support direction or control of financial institutions by Paymentech was even scarcer. As the district court observed, the record contained no evidence even of a contractual relationship between Paymentech and the financial institutions.
darkly
The older Jesus Trail was privately developed by American David Landis and Israeli Maoz Inon. They envisioned the Jesus Trail as a world-class hikers’ trail following the footsteps of Jesus and as a tool to promote learning about His life and teachings. They expect the trail will bring people together from different nationalities, cultures, and religions.
He was taken back for a moment. “It’s, it’s good to see you too.”
“My first thought was, this is what they do in China on party matters if you talk off script.”
When conviction fails to command,
1/4 cup condensed milk
How does an apple and blueberry pie sound to you right now? Don't you think a freshly baked apple pie served straight out of the oven sounds divine? Would you care to have one? Not only that, I made them in pocket or mini sizes.. is that how I should put it? Instead of a large pie, I wanted them in individual servings. So everyone could have their little pocket of warm goodies.
The Reds/Baseball blog. I just have to think of a good angle.
I have faith that all is for good.
I know how much all of us hate digging our nails into pot-packed products. There are times when tube products aren't our best friends so, pumps are always the best!
Searching the internet I have discovered some really motivational profound sayings. Here are some of them:
The things we agree to do in our spare time are what make us sane or crazy. Some people thrive on being busy every night AND all weekend. I say good for them. If they can keep it together while being in a million activities and groups, rock on. That ain't me. I need to recharge at the end of the day. EVERY day. I actually remember the first time I admitted to someone (in tears, over something stupid that got way out of hand) that "sometimes I get overwhelmed" so no, I wouldn't be able to make it to their party that night. That was a huge moment for me. Because not only did I say something out loud that I had been afraid to admit even to myself, but my friend's response was SO AWESOME (she's a Ninja Mom, so I shouldn't have been surprised). She's this Super Volunteer whose kids are well-mannered and her Christmas cards always have such great pictures. She was like "Oh, I totally understand! Stay home, get some rest, we'll get together soon!". And it was fine. There was no judgement. She didn't think less of me for it. She got it.
Last year alone, we had Colson Whitehead writing about zombies, Glen Duncan about werewolves,Tom Perrotta about the end of the world, and Stephen King (would you believe he’s “literary” now?) earning a place on the New York Times’ ten best books of 2011 with a time-travel tale.
-Don’t get gay and try to ride through a flock of geese. You will be thrown off every time.
Dr Alessandro Giardini, consultant paediatric cardiologist at Great Ormond Street, said: “We are really delighted to see Joe doing so well and thriving at home. He spent a long time with us in hospital.
accept that something is or exists and to act like it”, thus making the word
What do we think fellow bloggers?
And now, on with the TEN ON TUESDAY WHICH IS REALLY TAKING PLACE ON A WEDNESDAY:
Complaints are common because many meetings are poorly managed but also that attending meetings is an activity which almost everyone is compelled to participate in. This combination of a poorly managed event and high frequency leads to such a poor reputation for the effectiveness of meetings.
In addition, next week, I will begin a new round of the 52Words 52Weeks experience. I am going to constrain (or liberate depending on viewpoint) the expressions with a theme. Last year had a random assortment of ideas and characters. In 2012, I am going to focus on words of wisdom. I won’t say to much more about that…you’ll just have to come back and take a look.
Sadie and I had so much fun looking through styles on this blog. For some reason I couldn't get the link to work the other day. Its linked under my adoption blogs to the right as Happy Girl Hair. You can tell in the pic above that Sadie's hairline looks "fuzzy" in the front and I just did it. What I learned is that you can help the hair to not break and stress when styling if you allow these little hairs to not be in the style. Umm...clear as mud right? She made it clear on her blog...go check it out.
I Heard It Through The Grapevine vs. Feel Good Inc. - Marvin Gaye vs. The Gorillaz
So because I am sure you don't want to hear details of THAT, I leave you with pictures from my new camera. I am in LOVE!
a bit of a cry, a burst of anger, a sigh of delight
I can’t say if it was her who first showed her unfinished work saying “this is what I been doing lately”, but definitely, without that circle of skirts, her small jug of good wine and that relaxed cackle of female voices talking about their needles, spins and ideas. I would never have shown my own works to anybody, or had time to learn my own favourite stitches. Donna Fiora has inspired and encouraged me, and humbly saying right after these words “no, I didn’t do that much.”
"Alice is somebody that no one can see," said Frances. "And that is why she does not have a birthday. So I am singing Happy Thursday to her."
Desire is not the same as survival, one is bred to stay alive and to live with little and the other floats through life on others lives and his riches. I will gladly take what is yours if it means I live another day. When you have nothing to lose you have everything to gain. Swallow another pill and I will take you where you need to go. I am stronger, I am meaner and my compassion was lost when they took my parents. They spit on the ashes of my past, the shit where I slept and laughed as they watched the tears run down my burned cheeks. The image, the torture, the pain and the hatred is burned into my soul, the permanent tattoo that feeds my revenge.
Place the wings in a mixing bowl. Add a little OLIVE OIL and mix into wings. Season the chicken with the SALT, PEPPER, PAPRIKA, LEMON PEEL & GARLIC POWDER. Add a few stalks of ROSEMARY. I break them slightly at the bark to let some flavor out. Drizzle a bit of HONEY & BALSAMIC VINAIGRETTE over chicken and mix. Cover and place in fridge for a couple of hours to marinate.
TO MAKE THE FILLING: Heat the jam in a saucepan over low heat, or do this in a microwave, until it liquefies. Mix the sugar and cinnamon together. (I microwaved the cinnamon and sugar with the apricot preserves because I did not read carefully but it came out just fine.)
She then reached under my balls and found my “million dollar” or “golden” spot almost midway between my asshole and balls on my perineum. Reaching for some gel lube in the nightstand next to the bed, she applied a little to the thumb on her left hand and gently pressed in on that spot and began to massage it, making little circles.
I’m beginning to see that Rick’s knowledge of history is spotty at best. Which women signed the Declaration? Rick, just because they had long hair doesn’t mean they’re women.
And just recently, I decided to add weblogs as another victim to my list. Have been meaning to find a new outlet for a while now and this seemed to be the perfect thing. I just have to be creative with my thoughts and maybe someone could take me seriously.
“There appear to be some ‘similarities’ in the manner the government of the day handles the NFC case and that involving RTC (Rahim Thamby Chik),” said Mat Zain.
Investigations revealed that certain people had infiltrated institutions of higher learning and universities to recruit students to participate in “holy wars” in the region.
Dragos has been a very bad boy! Fans of the series know about some of the things he has done in his secret labs but in Darker we get to see that what we've learned about in the past is just the tip of the iceberg. That Drago is a real Dr. Moreau missing with the DNA of the Breed to make the Hunters so he could use them as killing machines that only took orders from him. But they weren't his only secret that came out of those labs.
We finished out the night at Mainstreet After Hours in downtown Lakeville; a coffee shop/wine bar that I've wanted check out. We've been there a few times for coffees but never for a glass of wine. We took some seats next to a table by the gas fireplace and settled in. It was a little discouraging to see such a small crowd on a Friday night but the woman behind the bar assured us that they're usually quite busy but that this has been an off week. That's good to know. We really liked it and intend to go back there regularly. There's an atmosphere within that can't be found at some of the more generic stamped-out-franchise places that we typically frequent. Plus, I always enjoy supporting a local business!
~Eating Food
shared with us a few other notes about the Shelby: It's still claiming the most powerful production V8 in the world, although Koenigsegg would disagree about what defines "production." Unlike the peaky engines of years past, 90 percent of the GT500's power from the supercharged
Multiple days over the past two weeks, Mr. W and I haven't gotten out of our pajamas.
2. Commonplace Coffeehouse - Best coffee in Indiana. TJ is really passionate about coffee, and his product makes that very clear. From the clover to the ristretto shots of espresso, this place will be sorely missed.
I’m always tempted to throw mine on the nearest chair or doorknob.
Brenner pointed out that “some researchers” argue that dolphins are so intelligent that they should be considered as “non-human persons.” WTF is that? Persons? I’m going to need shot of VODKA after this story folks! Brenner then poses the question: “What is repulisive about a relationship where both PARTNERS feel and express love for each other?” WTF? Can this guy get any more BIZARRE? Partners? Love? Sex? Is this guy for real? How in the hell does he know what that dolphin was feeling for sure? What if the dolphin felt RAPED after the affair as in VIOLATED TO NO END!
When you multiply the mass with the gravitational acceleration, you get the amount of force acting on the object in Newtons (like kilograms, seconds, degrees Celsius etc.). If you want to carry that information with you as a tattoo, put it down like this: W=mg, or Fg=mg if you really want to impress the ladies.
So women everywhere! Stop it! Stop it at once! There is no need to knock the unsuspecting down left and right as you pass by. Refuse to purchase perfumes that come in spray bottles. Insist, instead, on quality fragrances and use them discretely. Have some mystery about you! Some elegance! Some class!
“Next time I’ll shoot the camera first,” he tells her flatly. You can forget, I think, just how humorous CASINO can occasionally be if you haven’t watched it in a while because the film, as a whole, is so serious. Craig’s usually delivers his quips in a serious monotone, which helps to keep the film and character grounded.
A Life of Our Lord for Children
Knife and cutting board
I had the girls make Rosh Hashanah cards for their dad. I do, at least, have pictures of those...but ignore the misspelling of Rosh Hashanah!! The girls really enjoyed making these cards for their dad.
No one is starving, nutritionally speaking, but every time I do so little, I feel I am living little, too.
Want to be featured in a Reader Space edition? Have an awesome organizing story to share? I am looking for projects that have made a positive impact to your life. Please send your story and photos to iheartorganizing@gmail.com and I would heart to feature them right here, on the blog!! Photos should be high resolution and un-editted. Please include a description of the project, including any costs, inspiration, and how it has changed your life and routine for the better! Oh, and no worries my friends, we will NEVER judge "before" pictures because that just wouldn't be nice! Only love goes on at this blog!
…there’s no peace for the wicked as they say…
A spokesman for the Department of Work and Pensions, however, defended the judiciary costs, saying “we think it is right that more people are getting help to find jobs, rather than being stuck on long term sickness benefits.
Long lasting, this year’s Pirelli tires are not. But is that necessarily a bad thing? Michael Schumacher was quick to voice his displeasure in the press, following Sunday’s race. He accused Pirelli of producing tires, that didn’t allow the cars or their drivers, to reach their maximum potential on the track. I tend not to agree and in many ways, the high degradation of the Pirellis, has made for some very exciting wheel to wheel racing.
When Jesus stood outside of Lazarus’s tomb, he was surrounded by mourners in the midst of their own loss. Martha was weeping. Mary was weeping. The entire crowd was weeping.
Still a huge sex symbol when I was a teen….
what are some of your goals/resolutions for 2011? what was your high and low of 2010?
How about you? What do you look to cut when trying to trim down your book?
There is much that still needs to be done to it before I wear it again:
Accessories: Circle Nestibilties, Swiss Dots EF, Silver Beads, Glue Pen, Glitter, Dimensionals, Scor Tape
“To fight and conquer in all your battles is not supreme excellence; supreme excellence consists in breaking the enemy’s resistance without fighting.”
Looking at a bold objectively, it is absurd to achieve it perfect. There will consistently be a pixel or a polygon out of place, AI that behaves questionably, sections of gameplay that yield a few too abounding tries to complete, or any added abeyant problems you face if ambidextrous with user-controlled media. The capricious attributes of video amateur makes it absurd to anticipate every book that could backbite from the experience. But video amateur are not objective, are they? Unless you are reviewing a addle bold or a apish agenda game, there are absolute abstract elements that are all-important to bold design. (One could even altercate that the artful of a addle bold can affect the player's enjoyment.) A video bold should be visually pleasing, a agency that cannot be advised objectively. In addition, a lot of amateur strive to accomplish an affecting acknowledgment in the amateur — a action of joy, fear, excitement, etc. In actuality affections cannot be advised objectively.
In this case, they’ve defined reform as including: high-stakes standardized testing, “accountability” (including the elimination of low-scoring teachers and schools and merit pay), school choice, charter schools/deregulation, and mayoral control. These policy levers are supposed to lead to college attendance and the end of poverty. All other efforts, and any critics (especially teachers’ unions) are defined as anti-reform.
Long Beans, 4 pcs, cut into 1.5 inch length
Midair plane stunts! Between Bane’s apparent jailbreak and the BatKamikaze, TDKR looks to stay airborne at length. After the accomplishments we’ve seen in the occasionally intersecting oeuvres of Jerry Bruckheimer and Michael Bay, are there truly any new stunts left to perform above the horizon?
A barman at the pub who chose to stay anonymous said his shift started at 3pm.
“I’m a terrible person.” I tried to clear my head after having drunk up too much of the starry night and firelight.
From Top left to Bottom: Our first meal at Cafe Paradiso, my favorite restaurant. Great food is a theme in South Africa. Lauren on Table Mountain. Eating in Swellendam after a visit to Bontebok National Park. A staircase that reminded us of home, until we remembered we were carrying our recycling a quarter mile to the local high school.
This has quickly become one of my most perfect and favorite scents to wear. It is the just right fragrance to transition from Winter into Spring and to carry me through till Summer.
Snack:
For I’ve realized that’s another big obstacle for me–Any time I talk, I feel guilty. I feel like I should always keep my mouth shut.
A cow in the road, even a small calf, could ruin your weekend.
Chipmunks are very cute. They are cuter than rats. Nobody considers rats cute, so nobody minds if we put out rat traps. Some people consider squirrels cute, but quite a few people spot them as rats with furry tails, so they are at some risk of being shot. Also, squirrels have a lot of attitude, and scold a lot.
In my case (semi-retiring), I can choose the times I complete the surveys, and I can choose to do more or less based on my own schedule. I am happy that I am able to earn a supplementary income to my family from the comfort of my home.
Royal Ascot is the preeminent fixture in the flat racing calendar. Every jockey, trainer and owner prays, hopes and dreams for a winner on the hallowed Ascot turf. The world’s best horses test their natural talent at the Berkshire course in the hope of being recognised as a genuine champion. For punters, picking out the winners is as difficult, however the Stable View Blog tipping guide will guarantee you success over the five days of the Royal showpiece tipping the big winners in the big races.
Once they all go back to school and work I've one day free to try and finish painting the stairs. I started them just before the holidays as I'm getting sick of them not being finished.
This aching inside is that which I cannot shake.
Monday, December 10
*Note: The vegetables in this soup are very adaptable. I used a combination of carrots, celery and corn and use the guideline of having 2 cups total of any number of combinations (i.e. only carrots and corn, carrots and celery, carrots, celery AND corn, you get the picture).
The book opens with Penny coming back for just a week to celebrate their daughter’s birthday. She has no idea how to deal with the infidelity, but she must do it because they don’t want to ruin the party. Danny, who is deeply repentant, feels that this week will decide their future and her wants to do anything he can in order to win her forgiveness. Needless to say, this won’t be a fun week.
Twenty four hours – 1440 Minutes – 86400 seconds are all we have to go through a vast list of action items planned for our daily sustenance, personal and professional growth. Obviously this is too small a span to cram everything in it, and hence the need to plan and manage effectively. For a woman, sadly, the complexities are a little more pronounced than for men. Working women face myriad issues that have to be recognized and handled sensitively.
6For the LORD knows the way of the righteous, But the way of the wicked will perish.
“Somewhere on this globe, every ten seconds, there is a woman giving birth to a child. She must be found and stopped.”
With no family deaths to report on this week, the in house, training type footage was mainly made up of pranks and training. Ok I suppose but nothing to exciting. Faber’s guy lost again although he was up against the one of the favourites to win the thing. I’m not sure the fighters are allowed contact with the outside world. I’m not sure why.
As the Federal bailout bonanza prepares to spread beyond the mortgage and financial sectors to fill Detroit's depleted coffers, few economic or policy analysts have spared a thought for the destitution of the U.S. government itself. Put simply, our government doesn't have enough spare cash to bailout a lemonade stand let alone a bloated and failing industry that is losing tens of billions of dollars per month. Washington can only offer funds that it has borrowed from abroad or printed. Unfortunately, the nation is in the grips of a delusion that money derived from these sources has the power to heal. But history has clearly shown that borrowed or printed money only has the power to destroy.
It was NOT me that took advantage of the daycare at the community center that after my physical therapy today I did not allow my children to stay in there an extra 30 minutes so 1) I could work on my Bible study in peace and quiet in the cafe sipping a cold diet coke and 2) so they would be extra tired out and take an extra long nap this afternoon.
I then went to my loyal Cricut and cut out a bright yellow vinyl sign that simply just said "Batman" to place in the middle of the graffiti. And now I'm hoping this "graffiti" can now be called "art"! :)
I had a private myth:
For the topping:
No, don't be alarmed everyone! Don't run away! These really are the most amazing diet tips you'll ever read! Just try the wondrouns WILLTYPEFORFOOD tips for a well-rounded diet:
— 30 Pomeranians seized in Erie County SPCA raid; Man who owns 29 of the dogs charged with animal cruelty, housing violation
1/2 teaspoon (2 grams) baking powder
But then things start to change. Smythe uses a pair of spectacles to influence his subordinate's minds and when he goes into his office, he moves a painting aside and behind it is a very anachronistic video screen. Lady Jennifer and Carstairs both express a concern for their shared memory loss; Buckingham can't remember where her hospital is and Carstairs can't remember names, dates, or how long he's been there. Is shell-shock the answer, or some kind of German gas that effects the mind? So what we once thought was a pure "historical" story has turned into a sci-fi/historical; with aliens or humans-with-a-greater-intelligence meddling with the history of WWI. What an excellent idea! But where will it go next?
This last couple of days has been a scambling for everything and packing away, as my crafty corner is getting shelves yippe ! So I have not made many cards, but have some to share.
It’s the little things that stand out the most. The heat, oh the heat. Emerging from the last fringe of trees that shelter the border between Ashenvale and the Barrens only to be scorched by the afternoon sun. Barely out of the shade and yet already, I could feel the sweat pooling at the back of my neck, trapped by the heavy weight of my hair. There were whispers that just like the gentle Lady Moon favoured our Night Elf friends, the angry Sun sided with the hot blooded Orcs and Taurens who made these barren plains their home. Already our party was nervous, tensions rising like the temperature as we headed deeper into enemy territory.
Nagual oversees the Captain’s private backup and euthanasia, as he always does.
I bought my first running accessory on the weekend.
Los Angeles, 1997
We seem to have been travelling forever. Because of the thick fog, Frank has had to slow right down. The cabin rocks gently from side to side, and for a while Saskia has withdrawn into something resembling sleep. Her mum is leaning forwards with her head in Saskia’s lap, completely exhausted, breathing slowly. I rest my head back on the seat rest and close my eyes.
You have done wonderfully kind things for your friends and you've done kind things for yourself as well. You know being kind to yourself isn't selfish because you deserve kindness, after all, you are amazing! You don't need to tell the world how loving and good you are because it is irrelevant. You know it yourself and you are the most important person and the only person you care to impress with how amazing you are!
. . . for some reason the square format has always lingered in the background of the creative . . . MY creative processes . . . like a buzzing in the ears . . . Hasselblad, Yashica . . . TTL . . . SpartaFlex . . . retro . . .
Now I was really upset. We’ve complained about those people and their illegal trash disposal practices before. And shag carpet, no less!
Coming up shortly, a review of two blasters of 2010 Topps Platinum I grabbed at Meijer after the Michigan win. It's not a ton of packs, so look for that soon.
* Use of logo is optional.
"Okay" I say. "I don't think we should see each other any more."
5. Bake at 400 degrees for 20 minutes and check with a tooth pick to see if the centers of the muffins are baked. If not, put back in the oven for an additional 5 minutes and check again.
1/2 cup natural unsweetened cocoa powder (spooned into cup to measure, then leveled)
If you’re looking for a venue that provides a stunning setting and offers help every step along the way, while staying within your budget, Mission Valley Resort is the perfect choice. Let them take care of all the details so you can concentrate on the purpose of this special day; beginning a new life together with the one you love.
In control,
Now, please don’t think that I’m saying that if you are a talented rider with a wall full of blue ribbons that the IHSA or IDA aren’t for you and it’s NCAA or nothing. (Remember, the teams range from beginner to advanced – they’re at their best when they have depth on their rosters – and the only way to build depth is to have a wide range of riders at all levels.) The point I’m trying to make is that everyone has an equal opportunity to compete in intercollegiate equestrian competition, both experts and non-experts alike.
The forest floor was eerily silent. The constant buzz of mosquitoes and crickets had grown mute and the only sign of life I could see was a tiny bunny at my feet. My stomach growled and I decided I couldn’t wait for Mark to finish dinner. I reached out to a bunch of wild blackberries and ate one.
(note at 5.13 pm - after an interesting discussion on twitter with James Connolly, Glasgow Caledonian University, worth noting that where a contract is struck down for illegality there are issues about whether any claim can be made at all. Scots law on this is not as clear as it might be. The courts look at whether there is “turpitude” on the part of the parties. The nuances of unjustified enrichment, illegal contracts and the like are for another blog, or another day.
I just got off the phone talking to my parents. What gems they are. My mother is one of my best friends, if not the best. She has the gift of turning every negative into a positive, such a refreshing change and a much needed quality. How she stays positive is what I think I admire so much about her. Both my parents are in their mid 84 with fairly serious health issues. My father lost his hearing in WWII in one ear and has lived since with tinnitus and has a variety of aging problems, but I swear, nothing gets them down.
If you're unlucky enough to get an offer from Dodgy Publisher (and just about anyone who submits does), the contract reveals that the 50% isn't quite what you may have expected. It's actually 50% of what's left over after printing costs have been deducted from "the sale price."
'Good, my lord.'
Here's a natural fence in the front of our property that provides privacy as well as beauty, but unfortunately Mother Nature takes her own sweet time, and we do need the privacy. On top of that, last month we received an anonymous letter from a neighbor asking us to fix our fence so we don't bring down the property value in the neighborhood. How mortifying!!!
Scroll on down to see my Give Aways!
Also, Zac Efron stole my older teenage heart in 2006 when he sang his cute little brain out in High School Musical. Gosh, and he just keeps getting tastier and tastier. Wouldn't you agree?
The words of the Hippocratic Oath on the matter, ‘I will give no deadly medicine to anyone, nor suggest such counsel’ are thankfully still supported by a majority of doctors today.
After the Great Britain trials 38 swimmers have been named as part of the squat that will be heading to the Olympics in London.
On his 27th birthday, I got a call from a good friend who had been down in Wilmington telling me Ballyhoo! was playing. Jonny and I had gone to see Ballyhoo! so many times, and I was actually trying to create a fundraising benefit concert featuring Ballyhoo! (it completely fell through) so it was pretty crazy that they were in NC (they're a MD local band) on his birthday, even if it wasn't for my event that had fallen through. I had asked them to sing Happy Birthday to him but of course it got forgotten and I was so mad. I went out back waiting for my friends to be ready to go, when my dear friend who told us about it in the first place came down the stairs to tell me her husband was in a fight. We rushed up to see what was going on and there was no fight, just the guys of Ballyhoo! standing around. They apologized for missing "Happy Birthday" and of course I had talked to the only guy without a mic to do it - HA. So, they personally sang Happy Birthday to Jonny just for me and my friends. It was a pretty awesome evening celebrating his birthday, a way he would have loved.
After fighting the crowd along Bourbon Street, Peter walked into L’heure du crime and took a seat at the bar. Right from the start the ambiance of the place immediately satisfied his tastes. The actual bar was circular and occupied the center of the room, beyond that were small tables surrounded it looking almost as if they were in orbit. Further out along the circular wall were booths with privacy screens that offered total seclusion for those who needed them. Looking around, Peter was quite satisfied with the place; it had elegance and style with a cliental he felt equaled his own position in society.
As beautiful as this area is, the road became increasingly bad with frost heaves (fondly referred to as whoop-de-woos), deep ruts, and random pot holes. It must be a real challenge to build and maintain good roads on top of permafrost!
and i did it!
You know what you did, you know
If you’d like to hear more about Mick Ronson, let me know in the comments.
You will need a pound and a half or so of thin, boneless pork chops. I find it is easiest to buy a tenderloin and slice it myself.
20th Jan
And HERE is a listing of ALL titles. I printed it out and check off the titles as I find them at the library.
2. . . . never want a limo or a crazy expensive car, just a convertible VW bug. I’d still drive myself & park far away to avoid dings in my doors. I’d want a really fast engine & an invisibility cloak.
*People will always give you advice. Listen and accept it graciously and it's up to you if you use it or not.
Nap was loathe to abandon his fair capital, but one cannot be an emperor with only one country to rule. It was on to Spain for Napoleon!
KSHJN Blog (kshjnblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
1 What Does It Matter? 3:30
And they were about to shrug, turn around, hang their heads, head home. About to stop watching fickle stars now and forever. About to forget the whole delusion that is Hope, about to give up their wisdom for good old realism and practicality.
Conclusion
I want to explore things with my kids
~My daughters First Holy Communion, and what we need for that.
The man wore a tan trench coat & probably a tan fedora hat, I think that he looked like an old-style agent almost, and I remember the local & state law enforcement officers watching him & talking about various rumors about him; and they were mostly relaxing around town eating & drinking, like in real life, instead of working on the case.
Slid down onto the road
"Life has its' ups and downs, but you are far from alone.
In Round One of this blog hop held last weekend, I featured a cookie recipe. It's a long-time favorite called Rolo Cookies. If you'd like to see that post, CLICK HERE.
The "Afrikaner" never developed into a nation, never had a land of his own, never had to defend himself in a war, never had a flag of his own, and actually has no history to speak of. When it suits him, he tends to ride high on the history and experiences of the Boer Nation.
So here are a couple of photos my son took
All of that instead of realizing we created it, and now we are ready to create the next new thing. Which we create ucky if we are still hauling around all the garbage of yesterday, instead of just taking out the good parts and trashing all the rest of it… This includes unknown habits, thoughts we continuously think and express, like a computer stuck on rebooting, because the computer is full and needs more memory. This is easily accomplished by deleting old files then dumping the recycle bin, saving the good stuff and updating the computer with more memory or a new computer.
We have seen that three signifies Divine perfection, with special reference to the Trinity: The Father, one in sovereignty; the Son, the second person, in incarnation and salvation, delivering from every enemy; the Holy Spirit, the third person, releasing in us and to us Divine things.
Click on the image below to download, and leave some love if you like my work.
It’s time to let go though. Some words symbolise things, and my words symbolise something which I just don't understand anymore. Everything I go through - every little story - stays in me head, I have no need to write it down anymore? No need to run a commentary on me own life? I'm not a curious tourist or nosey voyeur inside here, I'm bleedin' living it!
April 21 = National Chocolate Covered Cashew Truffle Day -- that is one specific holiday!
About this time, perhaps 2007, I became very aware that with my life about to be reoriented toward getting a new business off the ground, a rapidly changing competitive landscape locally, and more world and American beers available as “guests” than ever before, the Pizzeria & Public House’s draft and bottled beer program (both guest crafts and guest imports) was in serious need of a rethink and some sort of upgrade so that it could remain among the best.
As with all corporate decisions though, everything came down to money and it certainly made financial sense, with the opportunity to give the Original Series another lease of life on TV and on the then new HD-DVD format. (Initially the Remastered season 1 was released on the now abandoned HD disk format with the staggering price tag of £100). This in turn could generate more interest in the franchise and bring in a whole new fan base and with the new movie imminent, Paramount realised that a lot of these new fans might want to come back to ‘meet the parents’ and see the original Spock and Kirk when they were still sex symbols.
Be still, and know that I am God; I will be exalted among the nations, I will be exalted in the earth.”
(Recipe from Shannon Barnes, Merrimack)
Here are places we visited that I have written about:
Life is sure a beautiful thing, and as I grow older I am realising that its the small things that I've experienced and the little memories that I have preserved that make such a big difference to it in the end!
Unknown (1 book of albumen figure studies, 1890s)
My first Mother's Day was quiet, but lovely. We slept in and then CB made me lunchfast, which consisted of pancakes with maple syrup from Quebec (yum!) bacon, strawberries and cinnamon scones. So tasty! We enjoyed a nice afternoon stroll with the baby and Loki (who is two years old today! Big day around these parts...) and headed to CB's parents' house for a BBQ. They are great! They babysat the baby for us while we attended our friends' fabulous wedding yesterday. First major outing out without the monster!
If you like some of those lounge compilation discs that were so popular in the late 90's, you'll love this record. This is bid band easy listening lounge music at its finest. Playing this in the house really sets a nice mood when you want to relax. I also was playing the record in the car this morning on the way to work and it made the morning, that much brighter. I'm so happy I've digitized it now and can have it with me on the go.
whatsoever the Lord their God shall command them"
Zest the lime. Squeeze the juice and set both aside.
NOOOOO! NOOOOO! NO! GOD, WHY?!!!!!
- Push up (15)
Place the tomato mixture in a blender and puree in batches until the sauce is a smooth consistency. Return to the pan.
someone who will not want to sleep with me till we are deeply in love or even married
i'm not sure why i feel compelled to share this picture. mostly because we miss these boys. they are silly and were most cooperative when our photographer asked them to "hold hands and skip toward me!" ???????
To some fitness people out there it may not sound like much, but to me it was a full work-out and I felt it working.
“I couldn’t believe it,” Tati said.
Ever find that a 12 x 12 layout is a little intimidating?
Tico Torres – Drums
By the time our scheduled departure drew near we realised we were 2 short of a full tour as some friends of James had yet to surface. A light knock on their door suggested they had wandered into town with half a dozen others but, when leaving time arrived and they were still MIA, a gentle pounding was applied to the door before the decision was made to leave without them. Afterall, a 6.6% attrition rate for a tour of this type is more than acceptable.
Drake – Lord Knows
Those un-Americanised ‘Briticisms’ translated:
Remember, I will be posting the summary of tonight’s review on Tuesday night. The full review will be posted on our website at www.emotionsdancesport.com/dancing-with-the-stars-professional-reviews.htm on Wednesday morning.
Place the cookies in the oven and bake for 10-12 minutes, rotating the sheet(s) halfway through. At the 10-minute mark, whack the baking sheet on a hard surface to deflate the cookies, if you like them more chewy.
I know it has been forever since I've updated our blog. Everything is so crazy right now. The Roberts that I work at is closing so I'm working a lot more hours than usual because the store has been crazy busy! Joe is still working and going to school and trying to adjust to my many pregnant woman mood swings. :-) With only 7 weeks left, we finally got the crib up and Joe was so awesome and rearranged the room so that the baby could have her own room. It feels so good to have the crib up! Even if the room is bare, she still has somewhere to sleep!
We discovered upon writing this letter that our villain wasn’t as smart as his brother, something we hadn’t considered before. Dad buying Roc’s degree with a building at Harvard was nowhere in this character’s back story. It’s a small thing, but when he and his brother are pitted against each other, every bit of smart counts. When this tidbit of information came out, Donald did some research on philanthropists who donated to Harvard, and Roc’s family suddenly became a lot richer than we ever imagined. His father’s character filled out, and even though he plays a background part in the story, we can see the monied attitude of Dad and how it will rub off on Roc, thereby deepening Roc’s character more than we anticipated. Roc, who thinks he deserves to be “The Promised One” will discover that money can’t buy everything, and it can’t buy the most important thing in life … true love.
Madame Bovary
I refuse to spend a great deal of time in a country and cannot speak the basics, especially having my 9 1/2 year old son. I mean look at the letter to symbol ratio! Lord help me!! My Bucket List seems to be getting the best of me for real! I have a lot on their but I can do it…. ( i hope – i guess ) LOL
Lay out on a parchement lined tray and leave to get cold
YANP: No I know all three of you are collaboration-heavy but have all of you performed together on stage?
Pushtwangers - Strangler From Behind (Relativity 1986)
The CSO has this month changed its format of presentation which is why you can now see private rents and public authority rents above. It is only private rents that is of interest on here as they represent market levels affecting private housing.
As I have been going on for some time, education is key. I cannot stress it enough. Don’t hate, participate, educate.
Are these tests merely a way of sorting children by race and class, as Debbie Meier pointed out in 2007, when Klein first proposed to base all admissions to gifted programs on the basis of high stakes exams, or do the results really reflect children's inherent abilities? And does the proliferation of G and T programs across the city help or hinder the goal of equity and systemic reform?
Discouragement is the spiritual and emotional equivalent of chains that keep us bound up. Discouragement can and will take us to a place we don’t want to be, and keep us there longer than we want to stay. We get into a state where we ask God, “Have you forgotten me?” Why do I have to go through this?” Even Jesus asked a similar question when he queried, “My God, my God, why have you forsaken me?” (Mk. 15:34)
Straight & sweep
Indicated airspeed: 145 knots plus or minus 10
Woo hoo just found a buncha pix from a SUICIDE show in L.A. when they opened for the Cars at the Amphitheater. ACC tried to keep up with the big boys that night and boy was it embarrassing to have to throw up out the window of a moving limousine with Martin and Alan and HT and Marty Thau in the car with me.
I almost skipped this recipe, but reading through the list of intriguing ingredients, I though I gave it a try. Glad I did, because it tasted delicious, the aroma of spices were really bring joy in the kitchen. Don't be discourage by the use of peppercorn on this recipe. Despite its name, this classic German Christmas cookies is not too peppery. And that is a good thing, because like (probably) most of you, I'm not that fond of mixing peppercorns for sweet treat, and very much prefer to reserve it for savory treat.
Bertien van Manen started out as a fashion photographer - and she still has an eye for detail and pattern - but inspired by Robert Frank's book The Americans (1958), she decided on a more documentary approach. For a time she photographed in black-and-white, but she changed her style radically in the early 1990s. From that point on, she travelled with great regularity through Eastern Europe and Asia. Her many travels and intensive contact with the people she met resulted in the book A Hundred Summers, a Hundred Winters in 1994. A logical follow-up was East Wind West Wind (2001), which was shot in China. In 2005 Van Manen published Give Me Your Image, comprised of photos of interiors in which the residents had placed a private photo of their own. Let's Sit Down Before We Go (2010) is her most recent photo book. The character of this book is less documentary than her earlier books and therefore allows more room for the viewers' imagination.
They also live on the weirdest shaped dress/shirt ever. I saw it at my thrifting store for a good five times before I actually put it on, and then decided I loved it enough to have it. It was marked down to a whoppin’ $3, so I think the rest of the world may be slightly blind to how incredible this shirt is. Of course, I happen to be of the opinion that if you make an item of clothing $3, that radically increases the likelihood of me finding it incredible.
Obama reassured the nation that this "suspect" had been charged. Reassurance? The president should be saying: We have captured an enemy combatant -- an illegal combatant under the laws of war: no uniform, direct attack on civilians -- and now to prevent future attacks, he is being interrogated regarding information he may have about al-Qaeda in Yemen.
Here's what we got:
Antarctica:
I used one of the plain colored pieces of paper of the pad and stamped the large paw print all over, creating my own DP. I thought that was a pretty cool way of using those plain pieces of DP and make it pop!
I feel the storm in the darkness
have an internet connection, convenient, self-paced, more time on task, offers flexibility, available 24/7, enables you to cut the commute, and they’re often less expensive!
I spent the weekend on a college campus for the first time in more than 15 years. It was not my own alma mater, so I would be able to explore, I thought, without suffering from nostalgia. Now, back at home, I realize how optimistic I was to think that possible. I mean, really, how could I not think back to Lloyd parties on Thursdays and Drinker parties on Saturdays and not get nostalgic? Spending an entire Saturday sunbathing on Founder’s Green? Debating politics with a roomful of people who agreed with each other, but loved the challenge of expressing their views anyway? Wondering whether Anna Karenina’s fate could have been avoided in another country at another time? Complaining about the Art History professor who failed to expound convincingly on the connection between the piece of art and the moment in history when it was created.
today, i got the kids to school, came home did the first day of c25k, stretched, had water, salad for lunch, got it all out of the way early so i couldn't make excuses....
I was roused from my knitting when I heard yelling outside the bus and the driver came to a screeching halt. Outside, at the bus stop were three people wearing their bedding. Yes, they were wearing their bedding. Two men in their pajamas wrapped up in blankets and a woman in her nightgown wrapped up in a quilt.
between anne curtis at angel locsin, mas maganda c angel. maputi lang c anne curtis. pag pina-itim mo, hindi na siya artistahin. mas lalong ma-emphasize ang bibig niyang malaki.
Woooo wee. I had to practically roll myself outta there.
“There are more party favors in the basement vault. Use those for tonight. I’m sure our friend uptown will come through in a day or two.” With that said, Michael rose awkwardly from his seat and left the room, his back hunched and his eyes following the elaborate patterns of the Persian rug below his feet all the way to the heavy arched doors that served as the study’s only portal.
There you have it - the reason why we are adopting - we just want a family! We do not have any diagnosis of infertility (which we get asked about a lot)- we haven't had any kids of our own and want to expand our family - we just want to start a family! And you know what???? I am so ecstatic about it!!! It has been so amazing the way God has worked in our lives and the doors he has opened through this process. You know you are doing what God wants when he provides the way - there is no guarantee of a smooth ride, but that doesn't matter to us. We will climb every mountain we need to in order to bring our baby home. ;) I feel like God has really worked on mine and Eric's hearts to get us prepared for this adoption process. It doesn't matter to us which child is ours first. It doesn't matter to us that we have to fly thousands of miles to get our child. We just know there is a child in Congo waiting for us, and we can't wait to get him/her!
She is now living in Turkey illegally. I am writing this so that a manipulative liar like this will not be able to take advantage of innocent families like us. One may come from a poor country but that shouldn’t prevent her from making an honest living.
OK time to try and recoup some of that time that I have lost.
Something in Rel's stomach twinged. It shouldn't be possible for a man so badly injured to be threatening. Stiffened with wariness, Rel's legs trembled as he eased himself to his feet. Clearsight, or perhaps just hunger, brought a wave of dizziness with its headache, but he managed not to reel. The far side of the chasm sprang into subtle grey relief, a web of jagged cracks and creases spearing into the depths. At his feet, stress lines leapt out of the concrete, showing him safe footing, and the cracks that wouldn't drop him into the Abyss.
Have you every wondered what God would be like if you met Him in person? What would He enjoy doing? Where would He go? What would He say? You don’t have to wonder. Jesus was God-in-the-flesh.
Starring
I love banana bread. It’s delicious and moist and reminds me of my grandma. The problem with banana bread is that you need 3 bananas, sometimes you don’t have 3 extra ripe bananas. So when I have 2 almost-too-disgusting-to-look-at bananas I make Banana Cookies. But when you just have one, I recommend these Banana-Pecan Biscotti.
*”Well, my wife likes fur but you don’t see me growing a tail.”
I have had a SECRET since this summer and I have been bursting to spill ;)
Discounted Kindle Books Going For Around One Dollar
Now look at the last step, see how all the colors blend together and each of the dark streaks doesn't stand out so much. This looks like a good, simple piece of wood.
Eric tried to appease me by saying that maybe I can wear it at night when going out to a party and sparkle is more acceptable. The thing is, you can't wear it to a party because there's 99.99% chance that a photo of you will be taken. Titanium Dioxide gives out a white cast on flash photography.
At this point, everything goes to shit. Or rather, it goes to vomit.
Our jobs included fixing and repackaging returned Christmas lights, clearing and sweeping the warehouses, sorting returned ornaments, and breaking down cardboard boxes. We worked hard. We were never on the official Sears payroll but my dad made sure he always gave us a few bucks for our time. But I think the main reason why some of us went to work with my dad was because of the McDonald's lunch break. We rarely went to fast food places as a kid and the opportunity to eat McDonald's was huge deal.
Well, to put it bluntly - That is Exactly what you are going to get.
I don’t consider my performance this year to have been exemplary, but I think I got through without too much damage to myself or the students. There were bumps in the road, some of which I suffered better than others, but mostly I found myself rising to the occasion and doing what I needed to do. But I’m not going to toot my own horn: if I were to self-assess, I would say that I get a C+ for this year, with my exceptional moments here and there.
I didn't know why you would pause in the doorway,
4.back to you
Besides, statistics say that you are more likely to be murdered by someone you know than by a stranger. I don’t remember being educated in the analysis of family and friends as potential threats.
and recordings of soundings
Finished Measurements: 6 3/4" foot circumference, stretches up to 9"
What’s keeping innovative products and business models confined to China? In general, its market is so large that domestic companies have little incentive to adapt successful products for sale abroad. In many cases, the skills and capabilities of these companies are oriented toward the domestic market, so even if they want to expand globally, they face high hurdles. Many senior executives, for example, are uncomfortable doing business outside their own geography and language. Furthermore, the success of many Chinese models depends on local resources—for example, lower-cost labor, inexpensive land, and access to capital or intellectual property—that are difficult to replicate elsewhere. Take the case of mobile handsets: most Chinese manufacturers would be subject to significant intellectual property–driven licensing fees if they sold their products outside China.
A bloated civil service not only sends the wrong message by keeping too many people unoccupied, it also leads to a considerable waste of government revenues and needlessly high expenditures which could have been better utilised elsewhere.
Thanking you for your so nice cooperation.
Then firm can also hire from a market of 6 billion versus from the local pool – the full talent pool of the planet is open to you.
band is yearning for simpler times, free from iPads and distraction. Dramatic and
And that’s OK.
Now, I am finding that I care less whether I ever get the validation I seek from others. I have it within me. I believe me. And that’s what matters most.
Now, we’ve moved on to medium. We just bought Pampers and Moony today, so we’ll see how they work. One thing’s for certain, the medium fits much better than the small. Pampers fits extremely well, and my wife said that she’s probably a Pampers baby, meaning she’s the right shape for them. The Moony diapers have an advantage, though. They have an elastic waste band. We’ll see how both brands hold up to leaks, and if they hold enough volume of poop.
Hmm….. food. The struggle, the fight, the fear, the fun.
P.S. I threw blackberries and vanilla in mine and had purple April Fools Day pancakes. Also I used Artisana cacao bliss on them instead of butter. I told you I was a chocolate junkie.
Both voices had begun to reassert themselves sixty-five days previously when Sands had invoked an ancient Irish tribal right, “when wronged by your more powerful neighbor go starve yourself on his doorstep until the shame causes him to relent.”
We also want to thank everyone for the support and prayers in our behalf. We couldn't have done it without you! We love you all!
Last weekend, I went down to my FLGS and bought a Land Raider Redeemer/Crusader. The kit is designed to build ONE of these two options, but if you are clever; you can build two!
The Concho River flows through downtown San Angelo. It attracts many species of water birds, and the stars of the show are the Great Blue Herons, (Ardea herodias). The whole riverwalk area is a beautiful thing in itself. A beautiful nine-hole golf course is one of the attractions. In this area across the street from the course are three of the herons’ nests. Two on the closest side of the river and one nest across the river. An acquaintance of mine had informed me that the chicks had recently hatched and it may not be long before they fledge.
Piecing together the clues about his father, the Enemies of Time, and himself, Jackson must decide how far he’s willing to go to save Holly… and possibly the entire world.
STATS for February 21, 2010:
*Attached blankets
They fought through many days and nights.
This one could have been entered under the water category too but I decided the light is just lovely. Taken on a walk near the estuary quite early in the morning....
International Relations Theory
For non-Scandinavians wondering how big an event NobelPrize Day is, this Swedish TV site gives you a good idea. http://svt.se/nobel
Looking ahead to the rest of 2012... I captured this moment on our boat, recently- heading smoothly downstream. Stormclouds still loom ahead, but the surface of the water, while moving rapidly and strongly, is calm and peaceful. I feel as if the extreme turbulence is over, and I finally feel up to the rest of the journey!
Bobo seems happy to hear his philosophy's repeated.
Who would have thought it would end like this? Cowering in a bathroom stall with my pants around my ankles, hand over mouth to keep my fear-wimpers silent... this was not the heroic ending I had imagined.
When awakened by a touchy-feely stranger, Rosa must choose between Tradition and her future...between a host of eligible princes and a handsome, fair-haired outsider. And learn the difference between being a princess and ruling as a Queen.
The tree and its fruit:
The flaws in these assumptions were glaringly obvious to anyone who was not as desperate to believe them as the media was.
Best Furniture. In the 13 years I have lived here, I have only been in there one other time.
My nominees:
My colleague Amy Beth Miller, editor of The Organized Executive, has recently been dealing with a very sick pet—and all the grief that comes with that. True to form, though, Amy Beth has recognized a number of take-away lessons from the trying experience and is sharing them on her blog.
I should have a moment tomorrow (during the Boden Weekly Review Roundup) to highlight some of my picks from this promotion, so be on the lookout for that, as well.
The Silence, the unseen enemy who blew up his TARDIS last year, have laid deeper plans and set the deadliest trap of all – one that has been ticking away in the Doctor’s life for longer than anyone knows.
The name is hidden on this one as it is a surprise swap, I used the embroidery feature on my sewing machine for the first time to add the name. I always have swappers guilt when I see how wonderful and creative some of the name tags are that get made for this event, there are some very clever crafters out there; alas I am not one of them! I do like the Denyse Schmidt fabric I used for this tag, perfect red, white and blue to suit the colour theme set for this year.
But it is just the artist who at times is denied those departures from nature which his art demands. He has even been charged with incompetence and deliberate distortion.
A defiant little thing
I may end up by myself, in a new place, with a new job (hopefully) and a new baby...but at least I have confidence that where we're going next will provide me with greater support when I have to say goodbye to my husband again. God, preserve me and my family so that we can have another "favorite memory" like I described above.
With the baby in one hand and the phone in the other, my wife stood over me shaking as she nervously called the emergency number. Not wanting her to drop the baby, I asked her to hand me the phone. As I chatted with 911, I looked at my leg (or what I could see of it, as I didn’t exactly have the best view) and tried to figure out what had I done.
So far only this one has made it onto a card - will use the others another day. The colours are quite pale and delicate and unfortunately look a bit washed out in the pics. I inked up the stamp with Memento inks in 'new sprout', 'summer sky' and 'lulu lavender' and then sprayed it with water before stamping - my fave technique again, makes me happy lol :o) I used 'summer sky' to ink around the panel and then mounted it on a layer of white card. The gingham is a scrap of Pink Petticoat (printed on linen) that's been hanging around in my scraps for ages. The sentiment is also Pink Petticoat.
Sweater - Joe Fresh
I added a photo of my husband and I signing the marriage certificate to "seal the deal." I also wanted to tie the green colors from my wedding party into the page, so I added some green velvet floss from RG to my page. I used my Martha Stewart Cherish punch to create the border and since it already has tiny holes punched into the border, it was easy to add the stitching.
I was very intrigued to learn of the new Institute for Dark Tourism Research that opened last week at the University of Central Lancashire. According to their mission statement, “The Institute for Dark Tourism Research aims to advance knowledge about the act of visitation to tourist sites of death, disaster or the seemingly macabre.” The Institute’s director is Dr. Philip Stone who spent 15 years in the tourism industry before becoming an academic. On reading Dr. Stone’s academic profile, I learned a new word as he has a Ph.D. in “thanatology” – society’s reactions to and perceptions of death and mortality and has co-edited a book, “The Darker Side of Travel: The Theory and Practice of Dark Tourism” (Channel View Publications, 2009).
Next was Quran reading and tafsir work which we are going to do as timetables again - think it's easiest for all to check off bits as we go.
The Rangers came out in the final session and continued to dictate the pace of the game. And early in the third period, the Rangers fore-check started to take it's desired effect. They forced a turnover behind the Ottawa's net when Carl Hagelin stormed in upon his man and separated the puck. He found Brad Richard skating down the slot who recieved a good pass and wristed the Rangers' fourth goal of the evening behind a bewildered Craig Anderson.
Six days without the known reassuring comforts of langauge, work, and a network of support, and now even the normally rock-steady heavens themselves decide to pull the rug out from under my feet.
And girls don't fart.
2 cloth
I suppose I actually did Poison Ivy's alias, Dr. Pamela Isley, but when it gets down to it, they are one and the same.
This second book in the ‘Earth’s Children’ series picks up immediately after Ayla’s expulsion from the Clan (Neanderthal) at the hands of its cruel new leader ‘Broud’. Taking Iza’s advice, she heads west toward where she expects to find her own kind, the Others (humans), and after a tentative struggle to survive the ravages of the elements, eventually ends up in a serene valley where she intends to collect her thoughts and learn some basic survival skills. Ayla becomes Ray Mears for a few years.
I’m very content that I made it this far. I doubt I can go this far without my team mates (:
confirm your E-mail by filling out your Login
You’ll never miss it until it’s gone
Speak about the weapons scandal of the early 1990s and everywhere you can hear a pin drop so silent are the bastards in the ANC. Thabo Mbeki, Jacob Zuma...they were all in on it.
But if you take two people with equal ability and equal intelligence, the one who deals with customers everyday is far more likely to have an accurate idea of what the marketing issues are than the one who sits in meetings.
2/3 Cup of Canola Oil
so as you move forward
+ we are deep into the spring & early summer season down here. it amazes me to see our bell pepper plants beginning to flower & sugar snaps heavy on the vine. our green beans are revealing some beautiful purple flowers, too!
Blah, blah, blah, Superboy problems. While I do get a kick out of seeing Superboy serve as the team’s equivalent of the Hulk, I’ve never liked him enough to fully enjoy the episodes that focused purely on him. He comes off as being so intentionally flawed just so he can have more deeply rooted daddy issues when being compared with Superman, which just doesn’t make for the most interesting of watches.
He is the longest serving political leader I know of.
The baby roses still struggling with the horrible weather, Halle and Queen Elizabeth in the front. Pope John in the back. Halle from Select Roses, Queenie from Walmart and Pope John from Minters Country Garden. Any bets as to who will do well? I think I will put up a poll!
But definitely, if you enjoy witty and unexpected humor from a romantic comedy, watch this movie because you will not regret it! I think too many people judge movies based on the demographics that they seem to target which is a shame. You might really miss out on a wonderful experience.
What does it mean to have your idols become currency? Are their ideas a way for me to purchase my own philosophy, to understand and exchange thoughts, ideas and emotions within a system of give-and-take? Do these bills embody who I am at the moment, what I love and care about? What does it mean if I burn this currency, these idols of mine? Move on from what has been learned? Use it to grow? Defeat them at the roundtable discussion they attend in my head and become my own amalgamation of their spirits? These bills will be distributed freely as a way to spread the power I have placed into this object.
Your word this month - Tricks
Interestingly, though, I seem to have lost the list of blogs I've been following all along--I'm not sure why this has happened. But I wonder if it's something tied to my inability to comment on any blogs as well. There has been a lot I've wanted to say in response to some excellent entries over the past few months, and every time I have attempted to do so, I'm hit with the "choose an account"--and when I do, nothing happens. It's as though I've no account and am thus unable to sign in at all.
As the image above might make you suspect, the first thing that leapt out at me was that the baguette, well, wasn’t. Shapewise, it was more akin to a bâtard; texturally, it was overcrisped and internally a bit insubstantial. Since I’m a bread purist, this was a major immediate strike against it. On the brighter side, several of the vegetables were just right: the carrots were well-pickled with the right sharpness and crunch, and the cucumber was a solid, substantial spear. There was no daikon among the pickles, alas, and the pork, although moist and flavorful, seemed to be a slightly gristly cut. The mayonnaise was extremely abundant, which together with the airy roll led to a fair amount of leakthrough, and it was a surprisingly sharp and spicy mayo, when compared to the often sweet sauce used elsewhere. The cilantro was present but only really as an afterthought, and I didn’t detect any of the telltale tang of fish sauce, either.
I said I found the framework of the handwritten postcards rather forced and artificial, not much more than a linking device for the episodic structure: it's not as if all of the postcards were in the bundle grabbed by Loyal when he's first on the run, and in reality many of those communications would not have been made on postcards but in letters. Most people, including even Jo, agreed. Jenny said the postcards had really irritated her, as she found them extremely difficult to read, which meant that she often lost their significance to the chapters they headed, and there were murmurs of agreement. Ann said, with reference to both the episodic structure and the linguistic style, that she wondered if Proulx's narrative mode was better suited to short stories than novels: she had read two volumes of her short stories and had found them wonderful.
The Game Reserve is now questioning whether they should allow people around the deadly wild animals and have suspended their picnic with the lions feature..... way ta go Mrs D'Mello, there is always one that spoils everyone elses fun.
Since President Noynoy was not very visible talking about serious matters when he was in Congress when he was in the Senate, I try to understand why he loves to talk his personal affairs more than the concerns of this nation.
Wishing you a rainbow
Alexis de Tocqueville, a young French philosopher of the last century, came to our shores to discover what magical quality enabled a handful of people to defeat the mighty British Empire twice in 35 years. He looked for the greatness of America in her fertile soil, her limitless forests and natural resources. He examined America's schools, her Congress and her unique Constitution without fully understanding the source of America's strength.
The great firm Casio with the launch of Casio WVA430J-1A solar watch has proved that it is a modern company with definitely a modern outlook. All the employees of this company are updated with the latest technology in the world and hence this is the main reason that this company comes up with amazing products every time. People have great expectations from this company and every time with the launch of their new product in the market, it increases the expectations of all its customers and hence this company then adds more loyal customers in its list.
20. NSFW Music Videos... Others have pursued the NSFW/ nekidness type-video theme before, like Sigur Rós last year, but this sure was the year for pushing the envelope. Yeahsayer had naked running people, Girls showed off their own penises, Major Lazer peformed dance-based sex acts minus the nudity while Massive Attack recently released a video for Paradise Circus with clips from old porn flics. Matt and Kim were the most original with their Times Square clothes ripping FU for Lessons Learned, but the best of the bunch was The Flaming Lips’ Watching The Planets... as much as I didn’t need to see Wayne’s Coyne, it was a fairly decent video.
Although a lot has happened during the past 20 years, one fact stands head and shoulders above the rest, and that is: THIS WORLD HAS CHANGED… it is no longer the same place it was 20 years ago, and 20 years is really not that long if you come to think of it! It is most definitely not the same place as it was more than 2000 years ago when Jesus and his disciples were still around!
We had our usual chat at bathtime and she told me that there had been lots of mice and then beetles behind trapdoors and she got so scared that she bolted. She said that another child did too, he’s non-verbal and he came out of school still very distressed with a TA holding each of his arms. Instances like that make me so glad that she can tell me, we always try to keep bathtimes very relaxed and calm and I talk the day through gently with her. So gently in fact, that she fell asleep on me!!
“But beyond the U.S. commitment to the NATO alliance, Stavridis noted Europe’s strategic geographic position. Forces easily can pivot from Europe into the Middle East, the Levant area at the crossroads of western Asia, the eastern Mediterranean and northeastern Africa, the Mediterranean as during the Libya operations, and down into Africa, he said.”
Quote: “Oh, look at me! I’m making people happy! I’m the Magical Man from Happy-Land, in a gumdrop house on Lollipop Lane!”
The rigor of secret is the ruthlessness of the Real, its inexorable inevitable impossibility. Secret will out—only via secret. “You cannot do better than to place yourself in darkness and unknowing . . . No need to call to Him from afar: He can hardly wait for you to open up. He longs for you a thousand times more than you long for Him: the opening and the entering are a single
5. Be happy you don’t have tuberculosis- Without a doubt, you’ve made a huge ass of yourself today. Everyone in the office will most likely look down on you as long as you work there. You’re probably going to have to sleep on the couch tonight, and nothing will compare with the hangover you’re about to experience when you wake up. But at least you don’t have tuberculosis. You won’t die a slow, painful death. Like life is putting a giant plastic bag over your face, and forcing you to run with it. You’ll never have to worry about wiping pieces of “lung” off your TPS reports. At the end of the day, you may not have your dignity, but you have your health. Not to mention some great memories, or lack thereof. Isn’t that what a good “Holliday” is about?
oh gosh, my only chance to capture a Golden Whistler male and he decided to move his head. I debated whether I should even include this snapshot but it is my only record of their wonderful plumage. Have I said it before, how much I love yellow-birds?
There are two snippets of code you can add to your blog.
There once Lived a Woman Who tried to Kill Her Neighbor’s Baby by Ludmilla Petrushevskaya (a collection of creepy fairy tales similar to scary urban myths) ***
David Whitehouse, joint administrator, said: “We have had a number of constructive and positive meetings with Strathclyde Police and we can assure fans that matches will continue to be played at Ibrox. Agreements have been reached regarding policing games at Ibrox and payment arrangements have been put in place.
If we both show up then you’ll know the truth Chad. But if you never see us in the same place then it’s probably a Clark Kent/Superman thing and you should be suspicious.
Hi everyone! It's time for the Gluten Free Ratio Rally, and this month's theme is the bagel. This is up there with some of the hardest rallies we've done (I find gluten free yeast breads the hardest to make gluten free), so thank you to Morri for hosting this month! Be sure to check her page for all of the posts this month!
(*Anne: Annabel is completely sane, and extremely creative. ;-)
On the upside, this was a pretty good weekend at the golf course. The weather was nice and tips weren't too bad.
The title of this post is Introduction to Beth Groundwater, Author of “A Real Basket Case,” but all I did was natter on about me and my running battle with Facebook. So, I’ll tell you what — if you click the link below, it will take you to my other blog where I am interviewing Beth. And that interview is all about her. I promise.
to my damage, they wanted to play bad,
-Ed Ruby, Director of Business Operations
I am pleased to report that he was dead chuffed with it :-)
This book should be read to every little girl on Earth. As much as I love Belle and Esmeralda, FUCK Disney!
In my trip today down this meandering road, I came to realize that this stretch of asphalt is so steep and twisty that someone must have tried to skateboard down this calle at one time. It is the only reason that this roadside sign exists…
If you're using the new Blogger interface, go to Settings on the left, then choose Mobile and Email (still on the left), then enter the Comment Notification Email. Whatever email works for you, regardless of what you sign in with.
Since she had always had a habit of hiding money, her ‘mad money’ as she called it, every thing needs to be look at carefully. A couple of weeks ago my family gathered at Mom’s house after worship services. We hid Easter eggs and the babies had a big time hunting them. We cooked hamburgers on the grill and had a wonderful day. When we were cleaning up the kitchen DD2 asked me if she could have her grandmothers toaster oven. I told her yes and she took it home. A couple of days later she called to tell me that she had found ‘the stash’. She had decided to try out the toaster oven and needed to remove the tin foil that covered the bottom of the tray and wash it before using it. When she removed the tin foil there were four 20 dollar bills and a 10 dollar bill that were shall we say a bit overdone….
I'm 20 years old and I haven't watched Breakfast at Tiffany's yet. Shame on me! However, I do know what Tiffany & Co gift boxes look like (which girl doesn't?). I wouldn't mind getting one... Anyway, back in December, when I was in London, I collected every possible flyer about what was going on in the city. I found out about a few skating rinks, because I like ice skating. I don't do any complicated maneuvers, I just like skating in a straight line, there and back. Where I live, one hour on the skating rink usually costs about 2€.
– 5 Civilians Added to Indictment List in New York City Ticket-Fixing
This is how I knew I was in love. This human emotion could only be described as a melting of the heart, exposing a true love that I wish would never end.
I posted these tips because (a) I think they’re interesting, and (b) I need to learn to resist my officemate’s cookies. But as much as these tips and tricks are being used to encourage healthy eating, cunning marketers may also employ similar tactics in the hopes of getting you to make the less healthy choice. Learning to recognize and avoid these marketing tactics may be just as important as putting them to use!
“I think it’s a very, very sad day when the only way you can express yourself is through slamdancing.”
I loved the displays, the decorations and the produce. These peonies in galvanised buckets really brightened up a cold April day. And the sign writing is fab with a bit of a post war touch.
Our survey of 48 branches of fourteen national supermarkets and high street chains found that food was regularly displayed at the checkouts and in the queuing areas, and the vast majority of food promoted was unhealthy.
May 4th:
the girls could not have been more perfect.
A little over 5 minutes in to the final period, Matt D’Agostini sniped in a shot off of an assist by David Backes. Jonathan Quick continued to play outstanding, stopping a total of 27 shots for the night, while Elliott stopped 16 of 21.
1. David Osband (H) 48; 2. Jack Berritt (H) 50; 3. Jacob Goodman (S) 52; 4. Michael Glatstein (S) 53; 5. Mo Godin (H) 54; 6. Lewis Raboy (S) 56; 7. (tie) Mason Raboy (S), Rob Janeway (H), Arjun Mehrotra (H) 57; 10. Jeremy Costin (S) 62.
So, when we were at one of my favorite fabric stores last week, she spotted this Grinch fabric.
Warm Climate, Camouflage On The River Wretched
Last year was my first year to join the blog party and I was so excited to meet some new bloggers! Here's a little about me and my blog! I blog mainly about family happenings. I also do some totschool and preschool posts with my younger two.
About the Store
NewCon Press; Ian Whates
Refrigerate until cool, and to let the flavours meld, and enjoy!
#2 European bank stocks are getting absolutely killed once again today. We have seen this happen time after time in the last few weeks. What we are now witnessing is a clear trend. Just like back in 2008, major banking stocks are leading the way down the financial toilet.
Their stock was shooting up in the month before the attack.
Imagining you wear a black two-piece,
jumping on a trampoline
And heartlines worn deep in the palms of your hands.
ENCOURAGE APPLICATION (playing a game): Invite one child to say, "I will live the Word of Wisdom by _______________" and fill in the blank with something he or she will do to live the Word of Wisdom. Then invite another child to repeat the phrase and the first child's response and then add his or her response. Ask a third child to repeat the phrase and both of the other children's responses and then add another response. Repeat as time allows, with each child adding a response.
When I read that description, I will tell you I was psyched.
When I got home I made a delicious grilled cheese sandwich with goat cheese, and some Spanish cheese I picked up at Whole Foods on my yumm-o rosemary bread. So much for the calories I burned on the cross trainer. (Waaaaa, waaaa.) If you have ever seen Debbie Downer on Saturday Night Live, that is the sound I was going for. . .
This baby whale shark floated so close that I could touch him. I slung on my snorkel mask and jumped in, queasy stomach and all. Our naturalist guide led us to a small group of whale sharks, We were instructed not to swim in front of the sharks because their eyes are on the side and they can't see in front. We swam on the side of the speckled fish, which are part of the shark family but are a slow-moving, filter-feeding variety. They eat plankton, microscopic plants and small animals. I was assured that human morsels are not included in their diet, which is a good thing because they swam so close to me that they brushed up against my skin. Although they ballooned out hundreds of feet around me, they weren't menacing but playful, like dolphins. Unlike dolphins, whale sharks are classified as "vulnerable to extinction" on the World Conversation Union's Red List. I'm glad I endured the six-hour adventure, there are only about 2,500 whale sharks in Mexico and I snagged an up close and personal visit with quite a few of them.
I have been mulling over the last few days about why we do what we do. I don’t mean as individual officers per se, but as a Force both Nationally and Collectively.
“They’re sort of an overlooked part of the population because they’re not very visible and very vocal,” Samuels said.
And tearing love apart
Wow that was a whole lot of challenges! I'm getting good at this challenge thing lol.
1331 D-XII/4/1999. “Antony and Cleopatra, The Battle of Actium and the Nature of Things.” Basic Program Theater Symposium, Shakespeare Repertory Theater, Chicago, Illinois. Dedicated to the Memory of Jason Aronson (November 12, 1929-December 4, 1961). See Item D-XII/6/1961.
This first one is of Multnomah Falls, outside of Portland. Carla and her girls took us all out there for a sightseeing trip. Lovely waterfall, gorgeous drive out there. We walked up to that first bridge you see towards the bottom, but didn't do the hike up to the top, as my post-surgery foot is still not up to tons of walking yet. I'd really like to next time, though.
Leicester legend is that the oldest curry restaurant is the Taj Mahal on Highfields Street which opened in 1960. This doesn't quite tie in with the period when Burgess lived in Leicester, so Denham's fictional dining review may be based on experience elsewhere:
“Rose?”
Since it's all about "brackets" right now and there's nothing else to write about, I thought it'd be fun to have a little informal, local beer competition.
Also, I'm currently planning Lulu's 1st Birthday Party..I was going to go w/a "Winter Onederland" theme, but lately, she has really, really been into her sock monkey & her Furious George. I have found some adorable sock monkeys, favors, decorations, and I think we are going to go w/a Girlie Sock Monkey Theme. It will be so cute. More on that later =)
TM 10 - Double-Edge
100-words isn’t a *rule* and some of us write more than that. My goal is to have The Friday Fictioneers use 100-word stories as an exercise in choosing concise phrases and strong verbs. It’s an excellent way to show your stuff to the world without exposing too much. It’s okay if you use more words, but if it’s much more let us know in the comments so we’ll know how to allocate our time if we’re trying to read all the posts.
Did I mention that I like chocolate? Mmmm...... chocolate.
During a conference call to discuss first-quarter earnings, Chief Executive David H. Long says the insurer believes there is a “distinct possibility” of continuing or even an increase, in storm events.
However, I have still been treating myself here and there, although money is tighter now we have a mortgage to pay again, and therefore I gave the SECC a miss this year - only the second time in 10 years.
When John opened the rear door of the car, the overhead light came on. He reached up to turn it off, but it had already slightly startled the girl. John slid into the backseat, shut the door, and took Charlotte by the shoulders. As he sat her up against him, her eyes slowly opened, and a slight amount of saliva escaped from the corner of her mouth.
Draw Date: May 2nd
In the summer he sits under an awning, selling paintings on the sidewalk. They are canvas squares of red or brown, of green or grey. They are paintings of buildings and streets, trash cans and curbs, cityscapes. He never painted people, or cats, or dogs.
Is there a grimmer subject than geography? And so much of it, I know now; know, that is, in terms merely of the title of topics we actually know nothing about: isotherms and tectonics, relief and settlements. Clueless, he’ll sit there, the false balloon of self-belief swiftly fizzling flat. Will he even remember to read the instructions, those hellish requirements to do one from Section A, etc?
This is my life turning inside out. This is what happened when I surrendered my plans to Jesus and trusted Him to equip me for all that He is calling me to. I fell in love with the thing that I was deathly afraid of apart from Him. Africa, and Childbirth were two of my largest fears growing up. Now I want to mix the two together. HAHA. You can't explain Jesus out of that one. Isn't it incredible what God does to our fears when we give them to Him?
We will never surrender!
“You need to be a smart consumer and read labels to make sure you’re buying products that are fortified. Dark green leafy vegetables like broccoli, collard greens or kale also are good sources of calcium.” Giancoli said.
Scheduled stagetime: 5.00-6.00 (17.00-18.00) (Afternoon)
By the way, my Grandmother loved taking her bouquet to the community room in her
Tears of regret are welling
712 **D-II/7/1976. “Self-Debasement as Self-Assertion: The Confessions of St. Augustine.” Basic Program Staff Seminar, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1993(2), above, pp. 83-98.) See, also, Item C-1997(11), above, pp. 14-23.
"I'll take the .45, you use the .22"
Thank you for listening to my whining. I appreciate it. Here's hoping for a quick and safe return for my husband and all the other military members away from their families :)
I can’t figure out what sucks more – being in love, or being in finance. HA! Jokes, jokes… I love you JRW, in case you forgot.
Aaaaand I think I’m done with my little rage.
www.mashable.com. Best practises in social media
Unless you’re into a bit of gender role-play (more power to ya)…chances are neither the person doing the fucking nor the person being fucked is thinking about penis.
Ellen
Of course, you can expect to read about my offline experiments – successes and failures – right here on this blog. Not that I think that my ordinary attempts at other people’s great ideas are particularly newsworthy, but who knows? You may be inspired to try a few new things for yourself.
The importance of articulating this country’s founding principles has never been greater:
XTC Dear God UK
Fitness/Activity:
United Breweries - UB Group Kingfisher Premium Lager
I started out with a vintage card from a Filofax. I loved the color and the fact that it was typed. I added in an old receipt that was for rent. I mostly wanted it because of the green and the ink was blue to go with the Filofax card. I pulled out one of Retro's Christmas images that is in 1-inch circles and one of their magnifying cabs and cut it out and attached it. I then created the wreath to go around it by dropping my Copic re-inkers onto some hand-made paper and added some blending solution to get them to bleed into one another. This technique works really well on hand-made paper because the fibers have been broken down more than commercial paper and so they bleed really beautifully. I added a little bow on the bottom to finish out the wreath look.
The station has 1.5 million listeners during any given weekday.
So I used the Scallop and Circle Punch.
The marathon will be held at Regatta Park, 701 S Lincoln Blvd, and will start at 8 in the morning until 12 noon. The race is open to any runner or walker from the entire state. Aside from the marathon, there will also be other entertainment including live music, awards, a Kiddie K, an appearance of the RedHawks’ mascot and an interactive fire truck for the kids.
Paulette and Frank McKotch have great pedigrees, three kids, perfectly spaced, she's from a long line of New Englanders, he's got the brains and the job that provides the life Paulette has come to expect. But one summer while vacationing on the Cape, a well-meaning in-law remarks on their daughter Gwen, in particular about her size.
The Scottish distillery William Grant & Sons has just released a new product.
the ancient acorn-eating peoples
The embattled Sanford Police Department, while condemning the leak, confirmed that the story was consistent with information private to the State Attorney’s office, which is currently considering whether to file charges against Zimmerman.
you can leave your entry in comments
in your traveling bag.
Kaliyo D'jannis +10 +2 crit
"What does it taste like?" I asked.
12. Books read and discussed and shared.
Of course, 6ix shots of Tequila and a short and affordable cab ride can make anything seem exciting. Which is how I came to be standing on the wooden floor of Irvines version of Syrup. Well it seemed exciting at the time. I'm painfully aware of my limitations in the nightclub setting of course. I can't dance, I'm now probably far too old to like the music i like, never mind try and shake a limb or two to it, I'm painfully shy, and my stock in trade, jaded witticisms, simply rise to the ceiling and fall flat on the floor, unable to be heard over the thumping beats of David Guetta vs The Egg. At least Syrup is small, Irvines equivalent is positively cavernous, entire hens parties get wrapped and encased in the ebb and flow of the smoke machine, like ships going off into doomed horizons, never to be seen again, only the shiny glimpse of the fattest girls psuedo-ironic fairy wand guiding rescue efforts. As my friend is showing off her new boyfriend - and he's all aftershave and studied indifference, imported beers and shiny shoes, textbook stuff really, I've seen too many people like him to care and make conversation about Miley Cyrus - I study the DJ for a while. The 1nes in my nightclub of choice in Hobart, the Syrup massive, stare bored out the window and couldn't look less impressed in their Red Herring shirts, the DJs in Irvine are all excitable, middle aged cruise ship DJs run aground. This 1ne has a whistle, an honest to goodness whistle, and his hands in the air - I hate that he cares. I sink a shot of what could be fairy liquid for all I know, and out of the cavernous wooden floor, through the smoke and haze, 2wo girls carry the bride to be under - all hair dye and regret - each arm, as she slumps on the verge of unsciousness. She is somewhat inevitably shoeless, and as she is lead through the nightclub, through the smoke, as her tiara crashes hopelessly to the ground like some doomed in flight object heading for earth, and as we part in the traditional Scottish ach thats a shame guard of honor, the DJ chooses just that moment to launch his most excited WOO yet, and fire up some Beyonce...it just wouldn't have been the same if it was Dave Dobbyn...
Spring training starts next week! Yee-hah! And March Madness is just around the corner.
Janet Reid: Pass.
their sighs of delight
Fast forward to the visits themselves. A frenetic tour of five schools in five days, all over the UK.
Amber: Are you ok Mommy?
“She was so upset that she resorted to this desperate act,” he told a press conference today after their plight came to light following the incident.
it is this:
In the experience
A lone gunman shot him three times in the upper body late Friday afternoon at a garage in the Anahuac district, on Mexico City’s central-west side, authorities said. Witnesses said the gunman then fled on a motorcycle, the Mexico City attorney general’s office reported. Acosta, 70, who survived a shooting attempt in 2010, is the second retired general to be assassinated in Mexico City in the last year.
While the media in general are paying far more attention to Greece and its determination to play by the rules and thus win back market respect, Hungarian maverick Viktor Orban takes the opposite view. He may well represent a far bigger threat to the shibboleths of our current form of capitalism.
Does this kind of talk breed respect or resentment? Love or fear? Peace or discord? Happiness or bitterness? What does a parent who speaks this way hope to accomplish?
It’s a losing game to wait for your boss/your CEO/your organization to change in order to accelerate your own learning and development. Sure, it would be great if all leaders recognized that coaching, teaching and training are investments, not expenses, but until then, it’s time for you to take control.
# Pass out and not remember a thing that happened.
Speaking about the chemistry of ideas, Mr. Alder said it is about ‘how’: how are you going to make the idea work? It’s a question that will make your brain sweat… Some people don’t want to think. They are not physically lazy, they are intellectually lazy. They want to take short cuts. Thinking through is the proof of your desire to succeed. You must be focused in creating a logic for your idea.”
and calls it a day.
One surefire way to tell an Earth Day post is done by an Earth Day denialist: They’ll note that the first Earth Day, on April 22, 1970, was an anniversary of the birth of Lenin.
a new exhaust hood
Hex #1 Sept 1985
A good school story makes you feel as though you're in the classroom with the characters. Many are set in boarding schools - an enclosed society, perfect for authors, although I did find myself wondering why there was no series that I could think of set in a modern comprehensive. Here's my top five, in reverse order.
Finally, the main point is that when clubs kick out the cunts from upstairs will come back and decide to carry on with their night further into the small hours and interrupt my sleep. I'd accept this if it were at the weekend but midweek when I have work the next morning really is shit. Like having till 3am isn't enough to work with? Instead they have to fuck up the sleep of everyone around them.
H&H Car Wash and Coffee Shop
:) I love my smartie pants.
At the very least it will be my personal, one-stop, resource for the IP information I use in my work environment.
¼ tsp + 1/8 tsp Coarse sea salt
In just a few short days, it will be Christmas! Whether we feel we are ready - or not - it will be here.
While I am sad that you are victim to your husband’s cruel behavior, I am also sad for your child who is witnessing a marriage he could hardly want to emulate.
Although the Chinese accomplished their objective, it is important to consider the challenge that South Vietnam was faced with. The Vietnamese Navy only had four warships at their disposal compared to the eleven warships wielded by the Chinese, this excludes the reinforcements sent by the Chinese on the following days. When one looks at these numbers, it is obvious that the odds were not in favour of the Republic of Vietnam. The Vietnamese soldiers understood this, but were willing to fight nonetheless. The United States, who were no longer serving in Vietnam by this time, believed that the South should have quietly retreated while China advanced on the islands. This did not happen. Faced with the impossible task of fighting off the enormous state of China and at the same time dealing with the invaders from the North, the democratic South Vietnam did everything in their power to fight the opposing forces. The soldiers of South Vietnam courageously fought to the end, fully aware of the impossible odds.
The manager of the safari camp is worried about a nature resort in Baja California that enables tourists to kiss grey whales.
Many people wonder why God, the Almighty Creator of our universe, has allowed people to become evil and why He is not doing anything to put a stop to it. This posting (in 2 parts) attempts to address this issue. The posting also touches on aspects of the First Earth Age theory and the two separate creation events.
1. My family traveled a lot as a kid so you might say I have a bit of a wanderer’s heart now. I adore travel and recently returned from a 13 month trip where my husband and I volunteered to help nonprofit organizations in Australia, New Zealand, Singapore, Thailand and Cambodia.
In Patrick Painter’s main space, Berresheim presents a group of beautiful, subtle surfaces of either white on white or white on black. Berresheim starts with a photograph, abstracting various structures and constellations, almost expressionist in their passages mixed with curious turns and flips. Perhaps it is Berresheim’s method of letting a machine print these images onto wood panels, but ultimately, the works are not existential or full of too much heavy breathing. Instead, Berresheim trades excessive lyricism in for slick mechanics and perfect surfaces. These images are “barely there” and are dazzling in how mute they are, you have to get in close to notice any image at all at times. If the images were painted, you would immediately think Terry Winters, late Jackson Pollock, or early Oehlen (when he silkscreened computer based drawings), but Berresheim’s use of machinery morphs these planes into something else, hybrid objects that are both unapologetically aesthetic but reticent to be too expressive.
Empower us, as a family, to live a healthy lifestyle. Empower us to be good testimonies of Your love, forgiveness and life-changing power. I pray that we would shine from an inner glow of Your Holy Spirit, and that it would attract people to You.
Lifting it
Flaunting your mutual adoration seems to be a kind of tradition. I think there is an underground, deep-seeded need for couples to hoist their love on to an unsuspecting public. A "We love each other more than you love your significant other" contest, if you will.
If you decided to enter please visit the link below and be sure to read "the rules of engagement" so your entry counts.
Well, while my mom was here helping us get the house in order, it happened again. I was working on my disaster of a office/craft/writing area and I got an idea for a project to help beautify the space. It was simple (in my head), and would only take a little detour from the organizing. It was all in an effort to make the organization more appealing.
I’m a new noun!
2 eggs beaten (add 1 tsp salt)
Marston Moor Business Park
That's a lot of baking.
Customer research
But researchers at the Tokyo-based Regional Institute for Global Change (RIGC) have maintained their forecast for the return of La Nina conditions towards the autumn.The Climate Prediction Centre of the US National Weather Services too had come out with an outlook recently suggesting the return of La Nina later this year.In what is a good sign for the Indian monsoon, the RIGC has also said that the La Nina would be accompanied by a ‘weak positive Indian Ocean Dipole’ from August to November.
Not knowing who you’re soliciting: If you query an editor, don’t say ‘Dear Agent’ because they are not an agent. Likewise, don’t address a query to a lady agent by saying ‘Dear Sirs.’ Giving us a choice (‘I am seeking a publisher or a literary agent’) means that you haven’t given the proper thought to who you’re sending the query to. Along that line, don’t say that you’re looking for a publishing house to represent you. Agents represent, not houses. There’s no need to say that you’re looking for an agent to represent you either. We know that any emails sent to the query address are queries. Just get to the point, *your book*
2010.09.14 Iraq Mosul 2 0 Two men are gunned down in separate attacks.
Durban, South Africa
Biblical folks appreciated storms. They prayed for seasons of downpour because they believed their lives depended upon the blessings which heaven alone could sprinkle onto them. A farmer depends on God’s rain and sunshine as equal needs.
Discover Frontierville tricks in FrontierVille Secrets, the best guide on how to play Frontierville.
So today, on this 6th day the the quest to Live My Best Life, I filled out the FAFSA. I want to go back to school, but I will need help. I can barely pay bills every month so there's no way I can add tuition onto that, and one of my bills is already a pretty hefty student loan payment so that's not an option either. I'm almost sure that I won't get very far with the FAFSA by way of grants, but that is my first step, because grants and scholarships are what I need. I'm a single mom of 3 kids with a desire to better herself; there's got to be something out there that can help me! This was just a first step... I will need to start scouring the web looking for other sources of free money so expect to hear more about that soon.
One adopter — and importer — of Japanese gear was James Freeman of Blue Bottle Coffee in Oakland, San Francisco and now Brooklyn. Freeman and his wife, the pastry chef Caitlin Williams Freeman, recounted a visit to Chatei Hatou, a Tokyo coffee shop where brewing coffee isn’t exactly a ceremony but is ceremonious. They said beans were weighed, ground, emptied into a filter and preinfused with a little bit of water that let the coffee bloom and release carbon dioxide. Cups and saucers were warmed, a slice of was set in the fridge to firm up. Only then was the coffee brewed, slowly.
Box 8:
2) Share this post on your Facebook page.
I’ve looked into other alternatives for eating in as well. I’ve looked into having meals delivered to my home. I’ve looked into cooking meals in other locations, and bringing them home. However, most of the meals rely heavily on foods I shouldn’t be eating (such as tomatoes), that I don’t want to eat (meat) or are more expensive than what I’m already spending per week – despite the eating out. We’ve looked into pre-cooking meals and freezing them (to no avail, and lack of space to boot). We’ve tried to make simpler meals. More complicated meals. We’ve tried buying more food, less food. We even went so far to try and buy junk food for me to eat in the house (so that I wouldn’t go out and buy junk fast food to eat). Turns out the junk food that’s in the house tastes worse and makes me ill. Go figure.
There are very few characters in TGoV — fewer than 20, I guess, all told — and the opening sentence of Anne Barton's Introduction to the play in the Riverside Edition goes thus:
In laryngitis, the tissues below the level of the epiglottis are swollen and inflamed. This causes swelling around the area of the vocal cords and they can’t vibrate normally. Hoarse sounds or loss of voice are characteristic of laryngitis. Laryngitis is a very common problem, and often occurs during an upper respiratory tract infection (cold).
Mac OS X built-in mail program could lead to an angry friend or an unhappy mac. Here are some tips to keep your mail virus free.
Theme: Ticket Giveaway (UK only)
This is something I really miss from home. Every time I travel to Spain I have to go to one at least. My favourite one is Maravillas, nothing fancy but with a huge range of products.
Christmases long, long ago
I still sport my diaper bag in place of a purse.
Some challenges I am having preparing for the AAGO exam are learning to transpose on the fly, improvisation, and the music history questions portion. Transposition is a skill that I think every organist should have. It is no easy task and I am still working hard at it with the help of Dr. Labounsky. She is also teaching me in the improvisation course all of the different forms that may be used on the exam. History has always been a weak point for me. The endless memorization of facts that I’ll only use a few times in life never really appealed to me. I’d much rather be practicing.
So, as you can imagine, I held my breath as I tentatively showed him the images I've showed you above. I waited for the nose wrinkle.
Challenge 4: February 12
He watches me, searching my face, half incredulous at my unconditional acceptance.
Indeed, if one believes that it is the case that God is
_____Is currently taking my " i don't give a shit" attitude to a whole new level. Going upstairs now.
Never forget them, the lessons they taught us,
Whenever a larger than life hero like Orde Wingate dies, his or her death is difficult for supporters and admirers to accept. Some speculated that Wingate’s enemies might have placed a bomb on the plane.
when i had awoke the next morning, mark had told me that he thought he had heard a bear sniffing around our tent when i was asleep, and was pretty freaked out about it for a good 30 minutes. turns out it was just me breathing in his ear. :) anyway, after breakfast, we went out on a day hike to emory peak, the highest point in the park. the hike was only 1 mile there, but elevation gain was almost 2000 feet! therefore, the trip took us most of the morning. here was a view along the way:
Ultimately, we are all paying in some form or another, whether we are publisher, author or reader.
Sharks save swimmers, according to Jonathan Lethem. How? Because after a shark attack, the number of drowning deaths decreases for a few years.
And how can you say no to THAT.
Speaking of writing, because I suffer the birth defect of being an artistic person I’ve always had the dream of penning… to use the figurative term… a work of fiction. Unfortunately for me my parents told me it is wrong to lie and I actually believed them.
A reconditioned phone too standard for you? No problem. You can choose your perfect smart phone from the wide range of absolute fabulous smart phones that have touch screens, voice navigations, cameras, video recorders, music players, instant messaging and Bluetooth.
1. Place cucumber slices in colander; sprinkle with salt, tossing well. Drain 1 hour.
Theme: 'Nature.' The term ‘Nature Poetry’ will be given a very wide interpretation by the judges.
A lovely day out in this area and I’m glad I went – A wake up call and a good bit of exercise for a Saturday.
Imprinted on the mould
Changing your IP address so it keep as one IP address is really important if you want to host a dedicated server with your friends this will make sure that the server will keep at the same address at all times. This is really important to hosting a server or else errors can occur nothing more annoying then getting your game thou the router only to have the IP address change and no one can join. Changing your IP to keeping to one is simply and easy to do using the program provided below.
One effective defense in his situation is to create your own private network within the WiFi network to which you are connected, which is known as a Virtual Private Network or VPN. The way a VPN works is that you connect through a secure, encrypted connection to a single remote computer, which then connects directly to the Internet through a firewall. That way, the only other computer on your “internal” network is your VPN host, which presumably you trust. In fact, you had better trust your VPN host, because all your communications are routed through it.
Do you still laugh and sing?
Another important aspect of courage is that it is not a momentary, one-time thing. Courage sticks with a challenge, however difficult, until it is finished.
With every last breath,
I don’t know what I did with the pliers now – or my tooth.
I realized while riding in an elevator yesterday I've forgotten U.S. elevator standing distance protocol. In Paris, you were lucky to have that tiny elevator at all, so everyone crammed on with joy, brushing up against each other's body parts and breathing coffee/cigarette breath down each other's necks. It was a packed, sweaty, writhing mess; Parisian elevators were unfun clothed orgies.
3 ripe and mashed bananas
Do you know how long and hard I fought for first place?
1tsp Cardamom powder
for it was me who wrote the words that swim around your head
The four outer stones are oriented based on the Sun’s yearly migration. The center column features a hole through which the North Star can be seen regardless of time, as well as a slot that is aligned with the Sun’s solstices and equinoxes. An aperture in the capstone allows a ray of sun to pass through at noon each day, shining a beam on the center stone indicating the day of the year.
Jeeves is a character who I suppose needs no introduction. One of the most well-known creations of Sir Pelham Grenville Wodehouse, he defines himself as the “Gentleman’s personal gentleman”. A valet of supreme intelligence (rumoured to eat only fish-hence his brainpower), tact and ability to handle all situations, Jeeves is the person to go to if you have a problem, a fact Bertram Wooster would gladly testify to. Nothing fazes this supreme human being, a charging bull and a raging aunt are handled with the same cool composure that renders them purring at his feet.
I bought a Babycakes cakepop maker and tried for the first time this weekend. As you can see, I need to hone my decorating skills...Nay, I need a cakepop class- Martha Stewart I am not... (FYI you need glaze not icing). But nevermind reading the directions I say!
We both laughed and danced and danced.
It has been rather a peripatetic week. Last Sunday, I was in Louth for the Mayor’s civic parade before heading for London in the evening, ready for the launch of the Joint Committee report (and the Alternative report) on Monday. It was a case of travelling back to Hull on Wednesday evening, ready for teaching on Thursday, and then departing for Oxford yesterday (Friday), where I delivered the first in a series of Beaufort Seminars on ‘Dimensions of Conservatism: Ideology, Policy and Strategy’.
In 1923 in Germany, a think-tank is established that takes on the role of translating Marxism from economic into cultural terms , that creates Political Correctness as we know it today, and essentially it has created the basis for it by the end of the 1930s.
15 I Cant Stay Long
I’m Every Woman
I saw a leaf, cling to a tree
Fast forward to this morning, the phone call. I was scared to answer it, for fear he was going to tell me my mom had died. Thankfully that isn't what he said, but I am worried today as her heart rate and blood pressure are up. He said she was in AFIB again. I thought the drs had found something that was going to control it, but I guess it's not working so well. The AFIB scares me because that is what caused the strokes, but if her heart doesn't slow down, it keeps going up, it could herniate and ultimately kill her.
Svigor said...
I owned a retail gift store and simply could not find an acceptable line of home fragrance. So, I learned to do it, myself. Within a very short time (maybe 8-9 months), people started asking 'hey, does this come in soap?' And, as they say, the result is history. I now make nearly 400 dfferent products...if you count available scents/flavors.
Whether his ‘unfitness’ was a show (so as not to get into trouble for charges of corruption) or not, it is mildly telling that Fox chose not to update the world on this story like everyone else is doing.
According to the company, "SereniTea is harvested three times per year at the peak of freshness from the coveted Wuyi Mountains of China, and is made from the finest whole tea leaves. Once the leaves are dried through the patented extract process, they yield a rich liquid that when mixed with water provides consumers with an innovative beverage unlike any other on the market. A great option for the health-conscious, SereniTea is USDA certified organic and possesses double the antioxidants of a regular steeped tea due to its concentrated properties."
Tip: write down lots of quotes. Read lots of positive messages. Think about them running and let them decide which one works!
How could such a sacrifice burn? It was in the hands of God and after Elijah prayed in verse 37, “the fire of the Lord fell and consumed the burnt sacrifice, and the wood, and the stones, and the dust, and licked up the water that was in the trench.” The end result is seen in verse 39. “And when all the people saw it, they fell on their faces; and they said, The Lord, he is the God: the Lord, he is the God.” This was done to manifest the power of God.
Taichung Municipal City Huludun Cultural Center
I’m not looking for someone to whom I’m joined at the hip, I don’t want someone interfering with me when I’m trying to do pottery, wear matching zip-up cardies and go on tandem bike rides, but it would be lovely to find someone who will chuckle at my little jokes, sample my cooking (a brave man indeed), appreciate all my quirks….. actually as I’m writing this I realise I haven’t a clue what I’m looking for….but the truth is I do miss a cuddle and it would be good to have someone to share stuff with sometimes.
In 2005 I stood for the parliamentary seat of Barking against Labour’s sitting MP, Margaret Hodge and I received 17 % and achieved third place, only missing second place, which was taken by the Tories, by a mere 28 votes! This was and is still the highest nationalist vote for a parliamentary seat ever achieved in this country.
"If the Great Spirit will show me how, I will make the white man red with blood; and then blacken him in the sun and rain... and the buzzard live upon his flesh." Debbie's comments:
Last night I got to be there for the first time he wrote his own name. It was hard work - his "M" constantly usurped by the pesky "W." We practiced over and over: "up-down-up-down." And the "E" - just as mine were before him, a comb of slashes on the single pole - "1, 2, 3, 4, 5!" He would mark them off proudly, beaming. "It's perfect!" I'd crow - and it was.
Arguably, he has reverted because of personal circumstances and the intense, destructive discrimination which he anticipated and which many of us do not, in fact, experience. The report does not state how he is now, many years later.
But right after graduation, I applied for a teaching position in the Ateneo High School, my old alma mater. I was actually excited, and I thought about all the possibilities of teaching in a school I really didn’t like but wanted to love. However, it turned out that the school didn’t love me back. I was rejected. Their reason? My degree is not an education one.
Myth #3 – Introverts are rude.
1. Zip-Lining (you will go across the Loboc River and get an excellent view)
Flavor: After the first refreshing sensation there was a rush by the sweet promise of the aromas and a sharp hop tang. Both graciously yielded to a non-aggressive stance. The second sip brought out some citric accents of grapefruit just for a brief moment. The third swallow brought out the floral accents that the sweet flavors had been hiding. The late entrance is rather dramatic and very welcome.
As you see, it is all about stereotyping. Labelling people and putting them in small boxes has become a norm in this era. Yet, people who have been subjected to stereotyping are left with no choice than to fight back. It could be an exhaustive task, but it might be interesting and a rich experience too.
Enjoy episode 9!
Tonight I am feeling so blessed. Great things have been happening for me and Eli, and I don't want it to go by without thanking God for His amazing gifts.
So I sorta ignored this functionality — until Mists beta. Since chain heal no longer consumes riptide in Mists, I spent some time specifically chaining off of targets with riptide. I was definitely starting to see why all those 25-man shaman swore on chaining off of riptide targets!
Scott S.
But there’s another wrinkle to ZaraCorp’s relationship with the planet Zarathustra. Their entire legal right to exploit the verdant Earth-like planet, the basis of the wealth they derive from extracting its resources, is based on being able to certify to the authorities on Earth that Zarathustra is home to no sentient species.
This bow is an example of one that Connie made:
It was juuuuust a second. My friend Sara came over to talk about music and as she left, we hesitated at the front door for truly just a second and Harry saw his chance. Darted between my feet and flew off the front step and disappeared in the direction of the neighbor's house.
Gentlemen, like ladies, had a variety of outfits that were considered appropriate to the activity. So one would have specific jackets that were more suited to riding, but overall the emphasis and time spent on dressing for the next activity was not as time-consuming for men as it was for women. Isn’t that always the case?
Back by popular request! Its Steps to Financial Peace, the life-changing and empowering personal finance seminar.
Is something that’s very much in fashion
Angus (looks at me like I'm crazy) - Do you know how they make a tattoo? They use a needle and the needle pokes paint into your skin! Your skin!!! That's crazy!
wonder why i bother to write in english ?
Don’t forget who’s child you are
Day 13 (Sunday)
That's all for today. Thanks for stopping by!
If they do not listen to Moses and the Prophets, they will not be convinced even if someone rises from the dead.
I wanted to let you know about a really cool charity movement that has just launched! It’s called Craft It Forward and it’s a great way to use your passion for crafting to make a difference in YOUR community. A handmade card can bring smiles to kids in the hospital and you can help us and our kids and maybe win by Crafting It Forward.
■A confident speaker with strong written communication skills.
The Joe Holzka Community Garden (and a big thank you here for including so many gardens on this tour, they are the epicenter of community and growth and big city delight and surprise) was tended by the adorable Kathy who allowed us free reign to smell, touch, and even taste the delights around the garden. Certainly the biggest I've visited, it hosted plants from all over the world (Kathy taught us how to tell what country of origin the planters were from based off the layout of their plots.) The colors were hidden and gorgeous, like I-Spy's in nature, play sardines until you stumbled upon their bursts of reds, pinks, and yellows.
I am honored and excited to be one of the inaugural speakers for a new event series: Brooklyn Dirt - Monthly Talks on Urban Garden and Farming. The topic of this first event is, appropriately, Dirt, aka Soil. If you have questions about soil, or dirt, let me know and Jay and I will try to cover the topic in our talk.
In a dark and dusty shop, a devil's supply of human teeth grown dangerously low.
What to do. I was carrying a glass of water to refill the buns dish so threw that up at the raccoon. It shook off the water and tried to hide more in the rafter. I yelled at it but did not get the results I was looking for. Then I went to get Jim and ask him what to do, fearing he might shoot it as a solution. It was full night so the coonie was not sick, just young and very tentative. No growling or scare tactics on his part.
The Kasztner Train:
I often mention experience here in this blog, as a differentiator in customer service. And I put it much higher than technical specification for the success of gadgets. My recent trip on one of the most luxurious trains in the world has provided me with another example of a great customer experience, with parallels to the more familiar Apple examples. In the same way that delivery times for Apple products have often been bettered by actual delivery dates, the Orient Express organisation mirrored this by setting expectations of a very reasonable level of customer service and then still exceeding it. This is actually a very simple thing to think about and execute but it's amazing how many organisations just don't get it.
Maple-dijon roasted winter vegetables – If carrot fries sound unappealing, try adding sweet potatoes and ordinary spuds to the mix and dousing them with olive oil, maple syrup and dijon mustard. This recipe was a huge hit with the adults at my Mother’s Day feast, although the adolescents (who ordinarily love sweet potatoes and even carrots) turned away in disgust and asked if there were any veggies without sauce. So much for making vegetables more appealing to kids!
The I am Legend parts
I love you. See ya tomorrow.Ah, he's no fun. He fell right over!
First, I am divorced. Yea! For those many of you out there going through the same thing (several of our blogging friends…) I assure you, you can get past the hurt. I did and have reached the “I’d never go back to that” stage.
I'm not afraid because I know,
Ditched is now out in the world. What’s next?
68. Go hiking
Pop on over to the main Color Me Creative blog to find out all the details of our challenge but don’t forget to visit the rest of our DT and also our guest designers too. They have some wonderful spring colours/designs to inspire you with.
front of card
Contact (Magic, Elemental, Psionic)
For many who are becoming open to our energies, you are now finding your abilities to have communications with us and gain connections with us at any given time as your abilities are increasing, and we say that this is both wonderful and has been meant to happen.
There was sometimes a virulent, nazi attitude towards political parties- as if we’d all just fallen from the sky and were mindless machines bent on “proselytising” and hijacking.
Western Conference Quarterfinals:
Add the cornstarch mixture to the pan, and bring to a boil over low heat. Whisk until smooth, and simmer the mixture for 2 minutes, or until thickened. If the mixture is lumpy, strain it through a sieve.
The film repeated its success at the 2011 Berlinale, where Farhadi received the Golden Bear for the best film and its cast ensemble received the best actor and actress Silver Bears.
For future reference, remember that you catch more flies with honey then with vinegar, even if they are diabetic.
- Dermaglow eye/ lip skin care: 15% off
I am an incest survivor.
As far as I’m concerned, the town drunk could live to be 90, but that doesn’t mean you should listen to him about diversifying your stock portfolio. Sure, he might be able to tell you the cheapest place to get liquor, but on the whole, I believe people are still just as clueless about life at 70 as they were when they were 20.
Fitness & Health
I'm posting from Buxton, Derbyshire, England and I am the newbie DT member. I have to say that I am thoroughly enjoying my time with this wonderful team. Before I was invited to be part of the DT I was regularly playing along with the SSW challenges and looked forward to every single Wednesday to see what wonderful sketch Arlana would have ready for me and everyone else to use. I got a place in the Top Three one week, then a bit further down the line I actually won a challenge. I was totally thrilled and flattered I can tell you. It certainly boosted my confidence and then to top it all off I was invited to be on the DT!!!!!!
I would want you to be part of the party, to enjoy yourself and feel like you our friend (indeed I think I am lucky enough to now count most of our lovely "suppliers"** from the wedding as friends).
The amendments would permit a Council to deal directly with the Office of the Parliamentary Counsel (PCO) to draft the legal instrument that gives effect to a planning proposal – the Draft LEP.
I'm sure it will be great, and hey- I might even like it after I do it- but right now I just don't want to. Maybe after I complete 100 report card assessments and finish 18 time-consuming report cards I'll have more energy :)
Cumin, Cinnamon, Cloves (I used about a heaped teaspoon of each)
What if my Students are bored?
When Wendy Everly was six years old, her mother was convinced she was a monster and tried to kill her. Eleven years later, Wendy discovers her mother might have been right. She’s not the person she’s always believed herself to be, and her whole life begins to unravel—all because of Finn Holmes.
These plugs need to be replaced quite frequently, so this isn’t something that is really all that new to me – I’ve done it thousands of times with no problems.
St. Mary's Church, a familiar landmark, standing high above the Tyne, has witnessed many changes during its 900 year history. One of Gateshead's last remaining links to its medieval past, until 1825 it was the only Anglican church in Gateshead and was therefore considered as the "mother church" of Gateshead. It was also the only place in Gateshead where you could get married!
***SPREAD THE WORD TO THE WORLD ON FACEBOOK about this release & whatever connections you may have! Let us know on "My Creative Time's" FB page here http://www.facebook.com/#!/pages/My-Creative-Time/364568506334 that you did so! OR you can just tag me in your post!
Recently, my media writing students wrote short scripts for me, and the major problem they had was differentiating between “action” and “narration”. In a novel, it might be perfectly OK to write the following: Sarah’s tears continued to fall as she thought about the death of her brother and the evil bastards who took his life without a care for the ones left behind. In a novel, that’s narration. In a screenplay, this type of writing is not VISUAL. We couldn’t, as moviegoers, know Sarah’s thoughts or know this is why she’s crying. That knowledge would have to be conveyed either through action or through dialogue.
This little plant is showing its great survival spirit to us.
These findings, and others highlighted in the new report, “Gallup World Poll: The Many Faces of Global Migration,” are based on a rolling average of interviews with 401,490 adults in 146 countries between 2008 and 2010. The 146 countries represent more than 93% of the world’s adult population.
One problem.
Purchasing a digital camera requires a certain amount of knowledge about the products specifications. It is not a consumer good that can be blindly purchased, but it is a consumer durable, an electronic gadget, that comes in the umbrella of technology that is always changing day by day.
